Postal, freight, and logistics industry high performance capability assessment 
US-8078485-B1
Accenture Global Services Limited
2011-12-13
https://patents.google.com/patent/US8078485B1/en
BACKGROUND OF THE INVENTION
1. Technical Field
This disclosure concerns a system and method to identify the performance capability of an organization on a scale of representative capabilities. In particular, this disclosure relates to an efficient and cost effective way to assess the performance capability level of key assessment areas within the processes of a postal, freight and logistics-related organization.
2. Background Information
Modern businesses operate in an increasingly competitive environment. To survive, postal, freight, and logistics-related businesses must adapt to this environment and execute in a clear, consistent, and efficient manner. Furthermore, the global nature of postal, freight, and logistics-related businesses greatly increases the complexity and difficulty of surviving on a day-to-day basis.
Despite the need for a business in the postal, freight, and logistics industry to meet the challenges of the global marketplace, it is still often the case that the business lacks clarity, consistency, and well-defined execution of its core processes. These shortcomings severely constrain the business, and lead directly to inefficiencies and waste due to unnecessary complexity, process exceptions, and customer dissatisfaction. At the same time, it can be very difficult to identify specific processes to which improvements may be made, either because the business itself does not have the expertise to identify the processes or because the complexities of the business frustrate attempts to clearly delineate the processes to be improved.
Even if the postal, freight, and logistics-related business, on its own, could identify one of the many processes that it needs to improve, the business would not necessarily know how to improve the process or be able to identify a concrete and measurable improvement goal. Another difficulty exists in determining whether there are any intermediate goals that should be reached along the way. As a result, postal, freight, and logistics-related businesses struggle to meet the demands of the modern marketplace and fail to identify opportunities for margin improvement, category expansion, portfolio optimization, multi-channel execution, selling performance, and to reach other important goals.
Therefore, a need exists for an efficient and effective system and method to assess the performance capability level of key assessment areas within the processes of an organization.
SUMMARY
A high performance capability assessment (HPCA) model helps businesses, particularly a postal, freight, and logistics business, meet the challenges of the global marketplace by defining a scale of performance capability along which the current practices of the business may be located. The HPCA model accelerates the discovery of process and capability gaps within business operations. In addition, the HPCA model also helps the business to identify specific areas in which improvements may be made, how to make the improvements, and how to establish levels of capability during the course of attempting to achieve an ultimate capability goal. As a result, the business can achieve the clarity, consistency, and well-defined execution of core processes that reduce inefficiencies and waste. For purposes of clarity and brevity, the term “postal, freight, and logistics” may be used interchangeably with the term “postal.” Thus, a postal, freight, and logistics business or industry is the same as a postal business or industry.
The HPCA model includes a key factor dimension and a performance capability scale dimension. The performance capability scale dimension defines multiple capability levels. The performance capability levels may form a scale of increasing organizational performance capability. One example of such a scale includes a ‘Basic’ capability level, a ‘Competitive’ capability level, and a ‘Market Leading’ capability level. Each performance capability level includes criteria specific to a corresponding key assessment area. Each key assessment area identifies some aspect of a capability of a business.
Capabilities of a business may be grouped into platforms. For example, the HPCA model may group the capabilities of the postal industry into ten high-level platforms, including a customer interaction platform, enablement platform, asset management platform, information and data management platform, contract management platform, mail operations platform, transportation platform, supplemental services platform, retail operations platform, and enterprise platform. Examples of capabilities within the customer interaction platform, for example, include channel management, product management, pricing, marketing, sales, booking and order management, solutions management, customer service, and invoicing. Platforms may include sub-platforms, as well as capabilities.
The key factor dimension establishes a set of key assessment areas in which to analyze the capabilities of a business. Key assessment areas include performance capability criteria. Performance capability criteria populate the performance capability assessment model. The performance capability criteria may be specific to any one of many different business capabilities. For example, the customer interaction platform includes performance capability criteria for channel management, product management, pricing, marketing, sales, booking and order management, solutions management, customer service, and invoicing key assessment areas at each of the capability levels along the performance capability scale dimension. Any number of performance capability assessment models and performance capability criteria may be defined and stored in a capability detail pool for subsequent retrieval and application to a business under examination. Accordingly, the HPCA model provides a flexible and adaptive scale of performance capability against which business practices may be compared to ascertain where the capabilities of a business under examination fall along the scale.
Other systems, methods, features and advantages will be, or will become, apparent to one with skill in the art upon examination of the following figures and detailed description. All such additional systems, methods, features and advantages are included within this description, are within the scope of the invention, and are protected by the following claims.

BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE DRAWINGS
The postal industry performance capability assessment model and system may be better understood with reference to the following drawings and description. The elements in the figures are not necessarily to scale, emphasis instead being placed upon illustrating the principles of the capability assessment techniques. In the figures, like-referenced numerals designate corresponding parts throughout the different views.
 FIG. 1 shows a high performance capability assessment model with a performance capability scale and performance capability criteria shown for different platforms.
 FIG. 2 shows a high performance capability assessment model with customer interaction capabilities shown.
 FIG. 3 shows a high performance capability assessment model with enablement capabilities shown.
 FIG. 4 is a continuation sheet of FIG. 3 for the high performance capability assessment model with asset management and information/data management capabilities shown.
 FIG. 5 shows a high performance capability assessment model with contract management capabilities and mail operations capabilities shown.
 FIG. 6 shows a high performance capability assessment model with transportation capabilities shown.
 FIG. 7 is a continuation sheet of FIG. 6 for the capability assessment model with transportation capabilities shown.
 FIG. 8 shows a high performance capability assessment model with supplemental services capabilities shown.
 FIG. 9 shows a high performance capability assessment model with retail operations capabilities shown.
 FIG. 10 shows a high performance capability assessment model with enterprise capabilities shown.
 FIG. 11 is a continuation sheet of FIG. 10 for the capability assessment model with enterprise capabilities shown.
 FIG. 12 shows a capability detail pool providing a multidimensional postal industry performance reference set where multiple key assessment performance reference tables are collected and stored.
 FIG. 13 shows a capability assessment system.
 FIG. 14 shows a flow diagram for establishing high performance capability assessment models.
 FIG. 15 shows a flow diagram for retrieving and applying high performance capability assessment models.
 FIG. 16 shows a flow diagram for analyzing representative practice data to determine a postal industry and a postal key assessment area to which the representative practice data applies.

DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE PREFERRED EMBODIMENTS
 FIG. 1 shows a high performance capability assessment (HPCA) model 100. The HPCA model 100 specifies ten high-level platforms, including a customer interaction platform 102, enablement platform 104, asset management platform 106, information and data management platform 108, contract management platform 110, mail operations platform 112, transportation platform 114, supplemental services platform 116, retail operations platform 118, and enterprise platform 120. The HPCA model 100 is not limited to the form shown in FIG. 1. Instead, the HPCA model 100 may be adapted and modified to fill a wide variety of analysis roles. Additional, different, or fewer platforms may be used in other implementations, with each platform defining additional, different, or fewer capabilities. Each platform includes one or more multiple <platform name> capabilities 130.
The HPCA model 100 establishes a multidimensional postal industry performance reference set that includes multiple key assessment performance levels 138, further described below in reference Tables 1-3. The performance levels 138 establish a scale of increasing organizational performance capability. The key assessment performance reference tables include a ‘Basic’ 140 performance capability level, a ‘Competitive’ 142 performance capability level and a ‘Market Leading’ 144 performance capability level. The performance capability levels establish a performance capability scale 146 along which current business practices may be located and identified with respect to any platform and capability within a platform according to an analysis of performance capability criteria (PCC). The capability under evaluation may be assigned the performance level 138 based on a capability position 158 along the performance capability scale 146.
The ‘Basic’ performance capability level 140 specifies ‘Basic’ performance assessment criteria, the ‘Competitive’ performance capability level 142 specifies ‘Competitive’ performance assessment criteria, and the ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level 144 specifies ‘Market Leading’ performance assessment criteria. The HPCA model 100 receives input data that specifies a postal industry platform (e.g., a postal industry area) and a postal industry key assessment area for analysis. The HPCA model 100 searches the multidimensional postal industry performance reference set for a matching key assessment performance reference table that matches the postal industry platform and corresponding industry capability within the platform and the postal industry key assessment area, and retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table. The HPCA model 100 initiates analysis of the matching key assessment performance reference table to obtain a resultant performance capability level for the postal industry key assessment area.
Tables 1-3 below provide an explanation of each of the capability levels 140, 142, and 144.



 

 
 



TABLE 1


 


‘Basic’ Capability Level


 




 




Description:
Capability mastery at a basic level is indicative of a low 


 
level, unclear, undisciplined, or unsophisticated ability 


 
to execute the capability or process in a consistent, traceable, 


 
and repeatable manner. For non-core, low priority, new, or 


 
early adoption of certain process capabilities, a basic level 


 
may be acceptable to the organization or the organization may 


 
not have the resources to expand beyond the basic capability 


 
level. A basic level of mastery often indicates that an 


 
organization is lagging behind its competitors in its ability 


 
to execute the capability.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 2


 


‘Competitive’ Capability Level


 




 




Description:
Capability mastery at a competitive level is indicative 


 
of a conservative ability to execute the capability in a 


 
fairly consistent, traceable, and repeatable manner with 


 
proven techniques, tools and commonly accepted practices 


 
that are readily available and maintained. This capability 


 
mastery may be a strategic decision by the organization 


 
to be a follower or “good enough” operator in many 


 
respects or may be an interim step that organizations aspire 


 
to move beyond to achieve a leading mastery of the


 
given capability. A competitive level of mastery often 


 
indicates that an organization is performing consistently 


 
with its competitors in its ability to execute a capability.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 3


 


‘Market Leading’ Capability Level


 




 




Description:
Capability mastery at a market leading level is indicative 


 
of a highly detailed, clear, and often iterative and 


 
sophisticated ability to execute the capability. The market 


 
leading capability is the recognized and referenced benchmark 


 
of continuous improvement and high performance for a given


 
process capability. The market leading process capability has 


 
been optimized for efficiency and effectiveness, is well 


 
understood, traceable, and consistently executed to the 


 
point of being competitively differentiated or at the top level 


 
of peer to peer comparison.


 





For FIGS. 2-11, the capability under evaluation may be assigned a capability level 138 based on a capability position along the performance capability scale 146 (e.g., the ‘basic,’ ‘competitive,’ or ‘market leading’ capability level). Performance capability criteria corresponding to the basic 140, competitive 142 and market leading 144 performance levels populate the HPCA model 100. The performance capability criteria capture criteria, characteristics, and/or other features of a capability at a particular capability or performance level 138 for a selected key assessment area. Examples below illustrate performance capability criteria that provide unexpectedly good analysis and benchmarking for postal organizations. The HPCA model 100 performance capability criteria provide a tool for determining where a platform and capability under examination falls along the performance capability scale 146.
For example, business consultants and industrial engineers may interview a business or receive data about the business to determine, measure, or otherwise ascertain the characteristics, criteria, and other features of a particular capability implemented within the business. The consultants and engineers may compare the characteristics of the business to the performance capability criteria in the HPCA model 100 and arrive at a capability level 138 for the capability under examination. In doing so, for example, the consultants and engineers may identify where the capability under examination falls in terms of the capability level for each key assessment area of a capability and determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 146 for the capability under examination. Performance capability criteria may populate the HPCA model 100 in whole or in part. Multiple high performance capability assessment models may be collected and stored with the performance capability criteria for future retrieval and possible modification in a capability detail pool, discussed below.
 FIG. 2 shows the customer interaction platform 102 divided into respective capability areas 202. The customer interaction platform 102 includes a channel management capability 220, product management capability 222, pricing capability 224, marketing capability 226, sales capability 228, booking and order management capability 230, solutions management capability 232, customer service capability 234, and invoicing capability 236.
 FIGS. 3 and 4 show the enablement platform 104 divided into respective capability areas 302. The enablement platform 104 includes a capacity planning capability 320, network planning capability 322, production planning capability 324, scheduling capability 326, labor planning capability 328, operations management capability 330, partner and supplier management capability 332, settlement capability 334, facility management capability 420, fleet and equipment management capability 422, and maintenance, repair and overhaul capability 424, master data management capability 432, address management capability 434, and document management capability 436. In some embodiments, the capability areas of facility management capability 420, fleet and equipment management capability 422, and maintenance, repair and overhaul capability 424 may be under a sub-platform referred to as asset management, while the capability areas of master data management capability 432, address management capability 434, and document management capability 436 may be under a sub-platform referred to as information and data management.
 FIG. 5 shows the contract management platform 110 and respective capability area 502. The contract management platform 110 may also be arranged as a sub-platform of a different platform. FIG. 5 also shows the mail operations platform 112 divided into respective capability areas 506. The mail operations platform 112 includes a mail production capability 542, mail preparation 544, acceptance and induction capability 546, mail sorting capability 548, and mail management 550.
 FIGS. 6 and 7 show the transportation platform 114 divided into respective capability areas 602. The transportation platform 114 includes a dispatch capability 620, pick-up and receive capability 622, terminal handling and sorting-handling capability 624, terminal handling and sorting-unloading/loading capability 626, terminal handling and sorting-sorting capability 628, terminal handling and sorting-storage capability 630, sea operations capability 720, line-haul capability 722, rail operations capability 724, air operations capability 726, delivery capability 728, and delivery-mail delivery capability 730.
 FIG. 8 shows the supplemental services platform 116 divided into respective capability areas 802. The supplemental services platform 116 includes a customs management capability 820, yard and handling area capability 822, track and trace capability 824, transport management capability 826, payment handling capability 828, special requirements management capability 830, and exceptions management capability 832.
 FIG. 9 shows the retail operations platform 118 divided into respective capability areas 902. The retail operations platform 118 includes store operations capability 920, category planning and management capability 922, price and revenue management capability 924, store inventory management capability 926, replenishment capability 928, and licensing management capability 930.
 FIGS. 10 and 11 show the enterprise platform 120 divided into respective capability areas 1002. The enterprise platform 120 includes a corporate strategy capability 1020, finance and accounting capability 1022, human resources capability 1024, procurement capability 1026, information technology capability 1028, information technology development architecture capability 1030, information technology execution architecture capability 1120, information technology infrastructure management capability 1122, information technology application management capability 1124, performance management capability 1126, and quality management capability 1128.
The following Tables 4-68 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the respective platform. Each capability may include one or more key assessment areas. Each key assessment area may include one or more additional key assessment areas. In other words, a business capability may include sub-capabilities, and therefore, key assessment areas corresponding to the multiple sub-capabilities. The tables below show specific criteria used to analyze each capability.
The following Tables 4-12 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the customer interaction platform 102.



 

 
 



TABLE 4


 


Channel Management


 




 




Description:
The platform contains all customer-interaction-driven 


 
capabilities between an organization and its customers, 


 
from order management to invoicing, as well as all 


 
marketing disciplines.


Basic Criteria:
Communication Flexibility:


 
Small number of distribution channels mainly to 


 
provide information to customer.


 
No integration with IT backbone, just static content.


 
Channel Economics:


 
Channels coexist but are not consequently managed.


 
Costs assigned with certain channels are not known.


 
Customer Support:


 
Customer interact with local representation.


 
Alternative contacts, e.g., central help desk not 


 
promoted.


 
Electronic Communication:


 
Limited availability of electronic communication 


 
channels with customers and partners, e.g., one 


 
common eMail address provided.


 
Self Service:


 
Category-based web self service for informational/


 
collateral inquiries via PCs, set top boxes, and kiosk.


Competitive
Communication Flexibility:


Criteria:
Variety of distribution channels available for customers 


 
and partners.


 
Channels are mainly single level, meaning that there is 


 
only one level of service regardless of the customer 


 
type or priority.


 
Some integration with IT backbone architecture.


 
Channels utilized consist primarily of traditional 


 
channels for that industry.


 
Channel Economics:


 
Basic understanding of volumes costs and margins of 


 
the different channels.


 
Managed on intuitive basis for better efficiency of 


 
provided service.


 
Customer Support:


 
Customers interact through multiple contact points, 


 
sometimes leading to confusion and loss of 


 
information or double and inconsistent communication.


 
Status of customer is patchy and not homogeneous 


 
between countries or business units.


 
Electronic Communication:


 
Limited interaction (e.g., capture of orders). Basic 


 
integration with IT backbone system. Milestone 


 
completion (status) is published.


 
Self Service:


 
Web self service for customer account specific 


 
inquiries via PCs, set top boxes, and kiosk.


Market Leading
Communication Flexibility:


Criteria:
Variety of channels tailored to customers and 


 
partners specific needs.


 
Customers guided/given incentives to use most 


 
appropriate channel.


 
Full IT backbone integration.


 
Channel Economics:


 
Clear understanding and management of 


 
channel economics.


 
Customer Support:


 
Contact point processes are highly standardized 


 
and tool supported.


 
Certain contact points are tailored to specific 


 
customer groups according to their requirements.


 
Customers can maintain of their own profile 


 
information on preferred modes of 


 
communication, delivery, etc.


 
Electronic Communication:


 
All communication can be performed electronically 


 
remote from customer's IT systems as, e.g., ERP or 


 
procurement platform.


 
Self Service:


 
Web self service for customer specific transactional 


 
inquiries via PCs, set top boxes, and kiosk.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 5


 


Product Management


 




 




Description:
Manage products and services as they are offered to 


 
customers. This is an area of innovation and opportunity 


 
management. Initiatives have to be aligned with Marketing, 


 
Sales and Operations. Product portfolio has to be


 
monitored and kept consistent. This area also contains the 


 
necessary activities to generate insight into the market and 


 
customers.


Basic Criteria:
Organization and Methods:


 
No dedicated organization for product management. No 


 
product management methodology.


 
Some individuals have been designated to manage the 


 
products.


 
Innovation Management:


 
Innovation is mostly restricted to match key competitors 


 
(“me-too”) or capture offerings that are already 


 
provided in operations.


 
Product Portfolio:


 
Inflation of similar products which cannot be properly 


 
distinguished by customers and lead to inefficient 


 
production processes.


 
Product value proposition not ensured along the 


 
supply chain.


 
Product development is driven by internal company 


 
needs.


Competitive
Organization and Methods:


Criteria:
Product Management organization has been defined.


 
Innovation Management:


 
Opportunities for new products are gathered 


 
sporadically from different sources like operations, 


 
general market trends or customer feedback and 


 
stored in scattered databases.


 
Product Portfolio:


 
New advanced services are designed, developed and 


 
launched jointly with key customers.


Market Leading
Organization and Methods:


Criteria:
Product Management methodology is available and 


 
trained consistently.


 
Product Management is well integrated with the 


 
other capabilities.


 
Process across capabilities for product introduction/


 
improvement.


 
Innovation Management:


 
Clearly defined innovation process and assigned 


 
responsibilities.


 
Available data within the organization (customer 


 
surveys, feedback management, etc.) is systematically 


 
used to leverage the process.


 
Applications support the collection, vetting and 


 
development of new ideas through virtual collaboration.


 
Offerings are driven by buyer values or predicted needs. 


 
Buyer value studies, focus groups or other community 


 
building activities are key inputs to the product initiation.


 
Product Portfolio:


 
Product Management maximizes both customer value and 


 
profitability.


 
Product portfolio is reduced in redundancy and optimized 


 
for Customer, Operations and Marketing needs.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 6


 


Pricing


 




 




Description:
This process determines of the structure and level of prices 


 
to offer based on the cost to build the product/provide the 


 
service, market requirements and business strategy. The 


 
pricing strategy and guidelines are established and the 


 
price is determined. The pricing is market relevant and 


 
competitive, covers the costs of the provided services and 


 
allows for appropriate margin contribution. It is 


 
communicated internally and externally.


Basic Criteria:
Flexibility:


 
Basic and additional surcharges can have no 


 
interdependencies between them.


 
Accuracy:


 
Pricing is based on data as given by the customer 


 
order and this data is only adjusted manually in case 


 
order data was significantly incorrect.


 
Customer Support:


 
Basic pricing grids are available to customers either 


 
paper-based or on website.


 
Governance:


 
Only basic pricing strategy is in place.


 
Pricing tariffs are managed in local terminal systems 


 
leading to no company wide overview of pricing and 


 
applied discounts.


 
Centrally structured pricing negotiation metrics and 


 
approval for more complex offerings (>5 days).


 
Market Agility:


 
Manual adjustments of tariffs only if needed. This is a 


 
time consuming process.


 
Price Determination:


 
Pricing mainly driven by market conditions not taking 


 
real costs (e.g., of additional services) into account.


 
Standardized pricing according to product.


Competitive
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Through multi stage pricing conditional pricing rules 


 
can be defined taking interdependencies between 


 
services into account.


 
Support for spot market integration for ad-hoc 


 
pricing of charter or quotation requests.


 
Accuracy:


 
Pricing is based on shipment data, e.g., with inputs 


 
from weight and volume machines being more accurate.


 
Customer Support:


 
Service in call-centers which tariffs are most applicable 


 
for customer's needs.


 
Governance:


 
Detailed pricing strategy along customer segments. 


 
Pricing guidelines are managed on corporate level. For 


 
Pricing real costs are considered.


 
Centrally structured and managed pricing negotiation 


 
guidelines for complex pricing and contract creation 


 
process (<1 day).


 
Market Agility:


 
Relative and absolute mass price update functionality 


 
is available.


 
Tariffs have start and end date.


 
Price Determination:


 
Some basic price simulations are performed. These are 


 
based on a basic understanding of associated costs.


 
Standardized pricing according to product and channel.


Market Leading
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Support for multiple tariff structures with different 


 
inputs within one contract (e.g., pricing based on pallets, 


 
items or bulk volume).


 
What-if comparison, e.g., with competitor's tariff 


 
structures can be performed during price determination 


 
in order to provide a Competitive offering to customers 


 
in Customer Management capability (sales).


 
Accuracy:


 
Internal controls ensure that discounts are applied 


 
appropriately.


 
Customer Support:


 
Users can request price information using configuration 


 
tool on website.


 
Governance:


 
Pricing strategy also includes demand and competitor 


 
pricing and capacity plan.


 
Centrally structured, value based pricing negotiation 


 
guidelines, with assigned resource for complex pricing 


 
and contract creation process (Real Time).


 
Market Agility:


 
Pricing can be easily tailored to Marketing promotion 


 
requirements.


 
Price Determination:


 
Price simulations using market research, scenarios and 


 
activity based costing.


 
Dynamic pricing options are available and yield 


 
management is performed. Customer profitability, loyalty 


 
and/or risk profile used to determine pricing.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 7


 


Marketing


 




 




Description:
This capability entails the processes for marketing the 


 
products, services and brands. These include conducting 


 
market research and analysis in order to develop and 


 
execute marketing initiatives such marketing campaigns 


 
and targeted advertising activities.


Basic Criteria:
Marketing Data Foundation:


 
Marketing and promotional efforts are using generic 


 
market information and intelligence to a limited extent.


 
Marketing IT Support: Standard productivity tools are 


 
used to collect and consolidate marketing data.


 
Campaign Focus:


 
No customer segmented marketing, no differentiated 


 
campaigns.


 
No formal process for marketing campaign design.


 
Campaign Planning Time:


 
Long planning lead times for campaigns.


 
Campaign Monitoring:


 
Little application of prior campaign learning. No formal 


 
response tracking.


Competitive
Marketing Data Foundation:


Criteria:
Marketing and promotional efforts target market segments 


 
in an industry wide format. Detailed market information 


 
and business intelligence is used to distill key insights.


 
Customer information is collected via transactional 


 
systems and addresses specific requirements.


 
Marketing IT Support:


 
Basic data mining facilities are in place for analysis of 


 
customer insight.


 
System support exists to assist or automate marketing 


 
activities (e.g., list generation).


 
Campaign Focus:


 
Campaign Management is used to foster the Marketing 


 
impact.


 
Increased use of targeted vehicles (e.g., email, direct 


 
mail), but limited message targeting. Marketing targeted 


 
to broad segments Marketing processes exist, but are 


 
inconsistently applied.


 
Campaign Planning Time:


 
Inconsistent planning lead times for campaigns


 
Campaign Monitoring:


 
Campaign results are tracked and monitored. Response 


 
tracking used to plan future campaign efforts.


Market Leading
Marketing Data Foundation:


Criteria:
Information at market and customer level is obtained 


 
to allow for targeted analysis, cross-selling, account 


 
planning, marketing and promotions.


 
Marketing IT Support:


 
Marketing applications support easy access and 


 
distribution of information to dedicated target groups. 


 
Advanced data mining capabilities and competitor 


 
tracking tools are available.


 
Full integration between marketing, sales, and 


 
customer service programs.


 
Campaign Focus:


 
Rigorous campaign management to outperform 


 
competitors.


 
One on one marketing. Customers finely targeted, 


 
with appropriate messages geared to customer 


 
segments.


 
Closed loop, repeatable and consistent processes 


 
in place for the marketing program.


 
Campaign Planning Time:


 
Short planning lead times.


 
Campaign Monitoring:


 
Analytics from previous campaigns used as input 


 
when designing future campaigns.


 
Consequent analysis and re-adjustment of Marketing 


 
spend.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 8


 


Sales


 




 




Description:
This capability entails all the processes that are necessary 


 
to sell the organization's products and services. This 


 
covers creating a sales plan/strategy, preparing for 


 
customer contact, executing sales activities 


 
(recommending and demonstrating products and 


 
services, etc.), and analyzing sales performance 


 
to ensure that sales objectives are being met.


Basic Criteria:
Sales planning:


 
Planning is done standalone without being aligned 


 
with other capabilities.


 
Sales processes:


 
Product based sales support.


 
Product based sales execution and objectives (eye on 


 
only one prize).


 
Account Management:


 
Product based business case. Individual account based 


 
management of contract terms and conditions (focus 


 
on the individual sale).


 
Sales Activities Coordination:


 
Sales activities are not systematically tracked. Only 


 
limited information about number of leads and 


 
contracts available. This activity is substantial 


 
manual effort. No historical information available. 


 
Manual handling of quotations.


 
Customer Data Use:


 
Limited use of customer data.


 
Sales Force Compensation:


 
Performance appraisals have little or no impact on 


 
salary. Fixed compensation approach.


Competitive
Sales planning:


Criteria:
Some alignment activities are performed between Sales 


 
Planning, Network Planning, Capacity Planning, 


 
Operations and Budgeting capabilities. However no 


 
joint planning is feasible as planning is performed on 


 
scattered applications.


 
Sales processes:


 
Consultative, generic solution sales support.


 
Combined product based sales execution and objectives 


 
(eye on a couple of prizes).


 
Account Management:


 
Account based business case. Central management of 


 
all customer contract terms and conditions (focus on 


 
the collective whole).


 
Sales Activities Coordination:


 
Sales activities supported by standalone applications 


 
that allow visibility of customer profitability, history 


 
and buying behaviors across modes. Tool support 


 
for quotations and RFQs. is available.


 
Customer Data Use:


 
Different sales approach for each customer segment.


 
Sales Force Compensation:


 
Some use of variable compensation tied to selling and 


 
service KPIs.


Market Leading
Sales planning:


Criteria:
Full IT integration supports collaborative planning 


 
between capabilities.


 
Detailed collaboration and optimization approach is 


 
in place.


 
Sales processes:


 
Consultative, industry solution based sales support.


 
Solution based sales execution and holistic account 


 
execution and objectives (eye on the big prize).


 
Account Management:


 
Jointly defined business case with shared exposure. 


 
Central management of all customer contract terms 


 
and conditions and their relationships to other contracts.


 
Sales Activities Coordination:


 
Networked sales force automation tools allow for global 


 
visibility of deals, leads, quotations and RFQs. Business 


 
intelligence solutions provide information at market and 


 
customer level to allow targeted cross-selling and account 


 
planning. Prospects tracking is performed.


 
Customer Data Use:


 
Insight into individual customer value/profitability, 


 
behavior, and preferences is leveraged to personalize 


 
customer interactions in real-time.


 
Sales Force Compensation:


 
Significant variable compensation as a percent of total, 


 
highly dependent on KPIs, including customer-centric 


 
measures.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 9


 


Booking and Order Management


 




 




Description:
Booking and Order Management entails all the 


 
interfacing activities required after the customer 


 
has agreed to a sale. This includes capturing the details 


 
of the order, validating the order can be fulfilled, 


 
verifying the order is correct, processing the order, 


 
releasing the order so that it can be fulfilled, verifying 


 
that the order has been fulfilled and performing of analysis 


 
on the entire order fulfillment process. This includes 


 
customer booking requests (for a capacity) and for orders 


 
(contract).


Basic Criteria:
Data Entry Performance:


 
Mostly manual order data entry performed into local 


 
systems.


 
Simple order validation by system.


 
No central order database.


 
Status and Workflow:


 
View and change order status not centrally possible. 


 
Basic workflow components.


 
The order tracking system is manual and inaccessible to 


 
customers.


 
Information is shared internally only in the supply chain 


 
segment which owns the data.


 
Regular FTL Bookings (Point to Point):


 
Managed as single shipments/capacities.


 
No systematic management of lead and loading times and 


 
event management.


Competitive
Data Entry Performance:


Criteria:
Multiple channels (manual, EDI, web-based) allow for 


 
automated order data validation by the system. Some 


 
manual verification on certain data categories is still 


 
required.


 
Order entry system linked to customer profiles, 


 
contract database and production systems: Pre-filled order 


 
templates enhance validation and prequalification of 


 
orders.


 
Automated order confirmation. Ability to consolidate 


 
multiple orders.


 
Automated reservation of capacity needed in operations.


 
Status and Workflow:


 
Enhanced workflow functionality including alarm and 


 
event management.


 
Tracking is automated and visible throughout the 


 
organization.


 
Customers do have access only through call centers.


 
Information is shared internally across the whole supply 


 
chain.


Market Leading
Data Entry Performance:


Criteria:
Customer order integration via EDI, Customer 


 
Automation Systems, or website.


 
Full integration: Automated order confirmation, price 


 
calculation and scheduling.


 
Mapping of the end-customer profile for incoming 


 
third party orders (customer's customer orders).


 
Status and Workflow:


 
Order tracking is automated and visible throughout 


 
the organization and electronically to customers. 


 
Shortfall in supply is forecasted and proactively 


 
managed.


 
Customers have full Track and Trace and Proactive 


 
Monitoring and Reporting capabilities.


 
Real time Information shared between supplier and 


 
customer systems, including funds transfer, POS data.


 
Regular FTL Bookings (Point to Point):


 
Full system support. Lead and loading times as well 


 
as events are managed according to detailed guidelines 


 
and procedures.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 10


 


Solutions Management


 




 




Description:
The capability describes the definition, deployment and 


 
management of non-standard, customer-centric products, 


 
services and solutions.


Basic Criteria:
Requirements Management:


 
Product definition and operational requirements available 


 
only on a high level.


 
Development takes only internal requirements into 


 
account: participating external partners are not properly 


 
informed and controlled.


 
Collaboration:


 
Limited communication between customers, partners and 


 
operational staff.


 
Insufficient coordination of milestone and product rollout.


 
Solutions Development Environment:


 
Only little tool support for collaboration and operations 


 
design.


 
Solutions Management Quality:


 
Products are considered implemented but related service 


 
commitments are not ensured throughout the whole 


 
supply chain.


 
Agility:


 
Long product lead times: New products or solutions 


 
cannot be implemented as fast as needed.


Competitive
Requirements Management:


Criteria:
Solution definition and operational requirements are 


 
defined on a detailed level.


 
Operations manual for each product/service has been 


 
developed and communicated to operations.


 
Collaboration:


 
Coordination and communication across all parties.


 
Milestones and project plan/roll-out is aligned with 


 
Marketing and Product Management capability.


 
Solutions Development Environment:


 
Technology is consistently leveraged to improve/extend 


 
services with a view to improve business performance.


 
Solutions Management Quality:


 
Product related services are ensured throughout the whole 


 
network. The product is properly integrated.


 
Service partners are aligned in order to support the 


 
product.


 
A business case is available and regularly updated to 


 
reflect real costs and benefits.


 
Agility:


 
Time to market issues are addressed.


Market Leading
Requirements Management:


Criteria:
New advanced solutions are designed, developed and 


 
launched jointly with key customers.


 
Technology and new opportunities are consistently 


 
leveraged to improve services and performance.


 
Collaboration:


 
Interests of stakeholders are properly managed for 


 
smooth collaboration.


 
Open and team oriented working environment.


 
Solutions Development Environment:


 
Rapid new service introduction enabled by methodology 


 
and early ‘fit’ design.


 
Solutions operational costs to serve are known and 


 
controlled.


 
Solutions Management Quality:


 
Service quality KPIs are defined and monitored 


 
(with roll-out).


 
Product operational costs to serve are fully 


 
known and controlled.


 
Continuous follow-up activities to improve 


 
product and service.


 
Agility:


 
Optimized high speed product development. 


 
Marketing takes development time into account 


 
during Marketing Plan.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 11


 


Customer Service


 




 




Description:
This capability involves the processes required to service


 
customers and measuring the service effectiveness.


 
Customer care is administered, customer accounts 


 
and customer profiles are managed, and warranty/


 
insurance and returns are processed.


Basic 
Customer Relationship Management (CRM):


Criteria:
Customer satisfaction only polled on ad-hoc basis.


 
No process for customer satisfaction improvements.


 
Service Performance:


 
Service level agreements are adopted by specific 


 
requests from key accounts.


 
No specific processes or systems are available to 


 
capture customer service performance.


 
Customer Specific Service Levels:


 
No customer differentiation, e.g., ABC customers.


 
No customer personalization.


 
Customer Service Quality:


 
Customer/Partner service initiatives are reactive in nature.


Competitive
CRM:


Criteria:
Regular surveys sent to customers with improvement 


 
suggestions.


 
Service Performance:


 
Key performance indicators are developed at the


 
regional level to support verification of customer 


 
service performance.


 
Consistent processes and systems are in place to 


 
capture data automatically with some manual 


 
intervention for service levels.


 
Customer Specific Service Levels:


 
Adjustments to a limited extend in service procedures 


 
for premium customers.


 
Customer Service Quality:


 
Customer information requests are handled dynamically.


 
Customer insight used to shape static customer experience.


 
Focus on relationships and value-add services.


Market 
CRM:


Leading
Customer satisfaction is closely monitored and relationship


Criteria:
management procedures are defined. Value contribution is


 
continuously optimized over the full life-time of the customer.


 
Service Performance:


 
Key performance indicators on global level. Fully automated 


 
capture of service performance.


 
Processes and procedures for around the clock service 


 
performance and peak times exist.


 
Customer Specific Service Levels:


 
Customer service performance is differentiated to 


 
customer needs.


 
Highly differentiated treatment of customers based on 


 
revenue and profitability.


 
Service performance is adjusted to customer groups.


 
Customer Service Quality:


 
Interactive, closed loop one-stop problem resolution. 


 
Proactive and interactive service established based on 


 
customer information.


 
Adequate information and empowerment to dynamically offer


 
incentives to retain high value customers planning to defect.


 
Using customer service to strengthen overall value 


 
proposition.


 
Virtual access channels (anytime, anyhow, anywhere).


Description:
This capability involves the processes required to service 


 
customers and measuring the service effectiveness. Customer 


 
care is administered, customer accounts and customer profiles


 
are managed, and warranty/insurance and returns are 


 
processed.


Basic 
Costs to Serve:


Criteria:
There is some understanding of the cost to serve 


 
customers/customer segments but costs are often merely 


 
allocated to products.


 
Claim/Complaint Centralization:


 
Back office processes are executed in the local facilities.


 
Claim/Complaint Tracking and Processing:


 
All transportation claims are manually tracked and processed.


 
Claim/Complaint Process:


 
Only basic descriptions of claims and complaints processes 


 
and guidelines are available.


 
Claims and complaints processes are distributed over 


 
several business functions.


 
Claim/Complaint Performance:


 
There is no visibility on claims and complaints performance.


 
Claim/Complaint Human Resources:


 
There is no specialized staff for claims and complaints 


 
management.


Competitive
Costs to Serve:


Criteria:
There is an understanding of the cost to serve customers 


 
which is based on a contribution level analysis for each 


 
customer/customer segment.


 
Claim/Complaint Centralization:


 
Back office processes have been centralized.


 
Claim/Complaint Tracking and Processing:


 
Automated claim tracking process.


 
Service representative are system empowered to resolve 


 
issues.


 
Reminders and follow-up actions are automatically generated.


 
Claim/Complaint Process:


 
Claims and complaints processes and guidelines have 


 
been defined on a case by case basis.


 
Claim/Complaint Performance:


 
Goods investigation processes have service level agreements 


 
(e.g., same day). Some claims and complaints key 


 
performance indicators are measured like e.g. 


 
the time to manage a claim.


 
Claim/Complaint Human Resources:


 
Dedicated skilled staff for claims and complaints 


 
management.


Market 
Costs to Serve:


Leading
There is a full understanding and control of the cost to 


Criteria:
serve all customers based on Activity Based Costing 


 
methodologies for all direct and indirect costs.


 
Claim/Complaint Centralization:


 
See Competitive Criteria.


 
Claim/Complaint Tracking and Processing:


 
Proactive and customer-focused claims resolution 


 
with automated submission and tracking systems.


 
Claim/Complaint Process:


 
Support tool with policies and guidelines which 


 
supports the staff during their work and increases efficiency.


 
The support tool is fully integrated with claims and 


 
complaints systems and provided context sensitive help 


 
and guidance to the staff.


 
Claim/Complaint Performance:


 
Key performance indicators are monitored automatically. 


 
Reporting and follow-up facilities are in place in order 


 
to continuously improve performance. Trend analysis on 


 
any category of claims or complaints can be performed.


 
Claim/Complaint Human Resources:


 
Dedicated staff is foreseen which is skilled. 


 
Accountability of individual employees to resolve 


 
claims and complaints courteously and fairly is ensured.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 12


 


Invoicing


 




 




Description:
Invoicing refers to order-to-cash payment collection:


 
invoicing preparation, delivery and investigation 


 
processes.


Basic 
Invoice Distribution:


Criteria:
Paper based invoices.


 
Multiple customer invoicing interface points within a country.


 
“Bill to” address can be different from customer address.


 
Invoice Consolidation:


 
No consolidation of transactions.


 
Rate Calculation:


 
Restrictions in rate calculation of basic or additional 


 
services. Services are rated stand-alone having no 


 
dependencies with other services. For international 


 
shipments manual split of duty and VAT for freight is 


 
performed.


 
Purchase order and non-purchase orders are 


 
possible to be invoiced.


 
Pre-Invoice:


 
Pre-invoice can be created in order to avoid credit 


 
notes after the invoicing. Reason is bad alignment of 


 
additional surcharges with the customer.


 
Self-Invoicing:


 
Customer cannot use self-invoicing option.


 
Customer Master Data:


 
Master data only optimized when errors detected.


Competitive
Invoice Distribution:


Criteria:
Outsourced invoice printing and distribution has 


 
been considered.


 
Still multiple customer invoicing interface points 


 
within a country.


 
Invoice Consolidation:


 
Invoice printing/distribution is consolidated in order 


 
to take full advantage of bulk mail discounts.


 
Customization of invoicing facilities is provided for 


 
key customer, e.g., invoicing separately for each 


 
customer's business unit.


 
Rate Calculation:


 
Restrictions in rate calculation of basic or additional 


 
services: Services are rated stand-alone having no 


 
dependencies with other services.


 
For international shipments manual split of duty and


 
VAT for freight is performed.


 
Pre-Invoice:


 
No pre-invoicing is necessary as invoicing stable and 


 
additional surcharges aligned with customers.


 
Self-Invoicing:


 
Customer can use self-invoicing option.


 
Customer Master Data:


 
A regular process for master data maintenance is in place.


Market
Invoice Distribution:


Leading
No paper-based invoice is needed anymore, payment 


Criteria:
can be made from EDI information; online approval for 


 
exception invoices over predetermined tolerances.


 
Invoice Consolidation:


 
Invoices can be consolidated for services provided by


 
third parties over other distribution channels.


 
Single invoice reflects charges for all transactions, 


 
on customer request across business units.


 
An invoice can be created for a customer for all services 


 
provided within a region or all over the world.


 
Rate Calculation:


 
Proper invoicing of away collection (pick-up in 


 
country A, delivery in country B, invoicing/customer 


 
residing in country C) is fully supported.


 
Complex rating rules are supported like multi-


 
dimensional tariffs, time bands and event segmentation.


 
Tariff change can be applied within an invoicing period.


 
Customer Master Data:


 
Customers can be required to complete their master 


 
data online.


 





The following Tables 13-20 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the enablement platform 104.



 

 
 



TABLE 13


 


Capacity Planning


 




 




Description:
This strategic planning capability contains all 


 
activities required to forecast demand, determine 


 
the capacity required to profitably satisfy the 


 
demand, identify missing or excess capacity and 


 
decide whether to make or buy respectively sell 


 
or use the capacity. 


 
Simulations and what if scenarios are used to run 


 
different models and determine the most profitable 


 
way to meet the expected demand. This capability 


 
has a strategic, long- to mid-term time horizon, in 


 
which forecasts are continuously being concretized 


 
and capacity planning decisions are reviewed, 


 
adjusted and cascaded into lower-level planning


 
cycles.


Basic 
Demand Determination:


Criteria:
Demand forecasting is based on historical trends only.


 
Each facility/division performs an individual forecast.


 
Forecasting is a manual task using spreadsheets; 


 
statistical tools are not available/used.


 
Forecasting techniques are judgmental and 


 
accountability is unclear/ineffective.


 
Forecast Reliability:


 
Reliable sales forecasts cannot be determined from 


 
Sales Planning resulting in a high degree of 


 
forecasting errors.


 
Higher spare capacities foreseen to manage demand variance.


 
Integration:


 
Capacity planning process is not effectively integrated with 


 
Sales Planning, Marketing or Operations capabilities.


 
Multiple forecasts exist for different functional purposes.


 
Frequency:


 
High-level capacity planning is tailored on yearly basis; its 


 
accuracy is not scientifically measured.


Competitive
Demand Determination:


Criteria:
Marketing insights (trends, events), sales forecasts, and 


 
external sources are used in order to forecast demand.


 
Volume and capacity are forecasted consistently 


 
across facilities.


 
Multiple algorithms are used to detelmine forecast.


 
Forecast Reliability:


 
Capacity planning can be forecasted to a certain extend 


 
in time and volume based on regularly updated sales 


 
and revenue figures.


 
Figures have probabilities assigned, and variance of 


 
historical data is measured.


 
Statistical techniques are well understood by users; 


 
specific data characteristics are evaluated.


 
As a result spare capacities can be reduced.


 
Integration:


 
Capacity planning is key input into an integrated 


 
planning process; all relevant resources are modeled, 


 
including space, labor, freight volumes, production, etc.


 
Operations managers and supervisors have access to 


 
forecasts and use them to adjust weekly/daily plans.


 
Tools not yet fully integrated, require manual alignment.


 
Frequency:


 
Regular update of capacity plan is performed.


 
Feedback is provided to forecast input providers through 


 
an exception based review process.


Market 
Demand Determination:


Leading
Demand is forecasted using statistical methods for 


Criteria:
trend analysis, including third party information 


 
and (real time) POS data.


 
Sales forecasts obtained base on production forecasts 


 
of (key) customers wherever possible.


 
Utilization of early demand signals or leading indicators 


 
for new products to extrapolate total demand.


 
Forecasting accountability spread across corporate boundaries.


 
Forecast Reliability:


 
Multi-level aggregation capacity planning is tailored 


 
continuously and forecast errors are monitored, based 


 
on tracking signal and number of manual overrides.


 
Shipment volumes are prioritized, e.g., by product 


 
code in order to compensate demand variations.


 
Integration:


 
Joint collaborative planning with Sales Planning, 


 
Marketing or Operations capabilities supported by 


 
fully integrated tools, e.g., to suggest alternate schedules.


 
Collaborative planning approach includes clients, 


 
partners and suppliers.


 
Integration of real-time demand information.


 
Frequency:


 
Capacity plan is continuously improved based 


 
on updated demand figures and probabilities.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 14


 


Network Planning


 




 




Description:
This strategic capability involves modeling and (re-)designing


 
the network by performing cost evaluations of locations, 


 
what-if analysis of current territorial divisions, transportation 


 
network analysis, and positioning of terminals and 


 
distribution centers, sorting facilities as well as 


 
identification of strategic partnerships, multi-modal, 


 
round-flow and consolidation options. The network plan, 


 
being an output of this activity, balances the goods flows 


 
between the recommended facility and provides a routing


 
table per product type on facility level.


Basic 
Network Complexity:


Criteria:
Simple mono-modal national network based on 


 
historically grown structures, processing presence 


 
in each (local) geography served.


 
Investment and Savings Detection:


 
Occasional identification of investment or savings 


 
opportunities.


 
Planning Aspects:


 
Planning is based on expected volumes and available 


 
capacities only.


 
Network planning is of tactical, rather than strategic 


 
nature.


 
Strategic planning takes place in reaction to major 


 
discontinuities or marketplace events.


 
Planning is done without standard tools and each 


 
processing center may have different format of plans.


 
One-size-fits-all philosophy towards processing 


 
centers; each center had nearly identical processing 


 
plans.


 
Back and round flows are subject of investigation.


 
Network plan is verified against service commitments 


 
(e.g., day + 1 delivery within the country).


 
Average transit times between terminals and hubs 


 
are taken into account during planning activity.


 
Integration:


 
Network plan adapted based on input from operations.


 
Partner integration is not considered/feasible.


Competitive
Network complexity:


Criteria:
Regional network with limited flexibility. The network 


 
is not tailored to specific customers or customer segments.


 
Inter-modal options are considered based on a rough 


 
calculation scheme.


 
Multiple routing options are supported for overload 


 
management but without further differentiation 


 
(e.g., by product code).


 
Some variability in scheduling plans at facilities,


 
allowing capacity to be shared across the network.


 
Investment and Savings Detection:


 
Structured process for identification of investment 


 
or saving opportunities.


 
Planning Aspects:


 
Thorough analysis of vulnerabilities, dependencies 


 
and sensitivity is performed; strategic planning 


 
occurs periodically.


 
Appliance of what-if scenarios. Sorting time-lags at 


 
hubs and terminals are taken into account.


 
Outsourcing of network lines is a considered option.


 
Standard tools are in place to help with the short 


 
term planning (focus on data collection).


 
Integration:


 
Mid-term sales forecasts considered for network 


 
planning, alignment with capacity planning.


 
Key partners are integration to various extends into 


 
the network plan.


Market 
Network complexity:


Leading
Global network strategy under proactive reviews.


Criteria:
The regional or global network is planned inter-modal. 


 
Partners are fully integrated within the network plan.


 
Varying routings can be determined based on product 


 
code/service level of shipment (e.g., standard deferred 


 
shipments vs. time definite shipments).


 
Investment and Savings Detection:


 
Network simulation is a significant input into 


 
M&A decisions.


 
Product flow and locations across the supply chain 


 
are optimized of cost, quality and service parameters.


 
Planning Aspects:


 
Customer and product SLAs and various optional 


 
constraints considered in the planning process.


 
Network is flexible and therefore adapted to 


 
demand pattern changes, seasonality or terminal 


 
unavailability; outsourcing is applied where 


 
appropriate.


 
Simulation tools are used applying strategic or 


 
heuristic approaches.


 
Analytical tools support longer-term planning 


 
processes to understand the flexibility of the entire 


 
network.


 
Integration:


 
Fully integrated Capacity and Network Planning.


 
Partners are fully integrated into the network plan.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 15


 


Production Planning


 




 




Description:
Production Planning is a tactical planning level where 


 
pick-up and delivery zones are determined and according 


 
pick-up, delivery and network tours are pre-planned. If there 


 
is varying supply/demand in different geographical regions 


 
the tactical balancing of equipment is investigated.


 
An integrated production plan for resources and equipment,


 
including sorting activities, within the terminals is created 


 
and managed.


Basic 
Planning Approach:


Criteria:
Planning process is reactive due to limited information 


 
and visibility of future demand.


 
Manual planning in monthly time periods with no 


 
simulation capability.


 
Systems not integrated across multiple-plant environments.


 
Transportation plans are developed for either inbound 


 
or outbound direction only.


 
Decisions based on cost or service alone; Incomplete cost


 
control/accountability (e.g., proper cost allocation).


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Plans are static for long timeframes within a facility.


 
Sort plans created without analytical tools; based on volume


 
observations.


 
Most processes are done manually with little tracking of 


 
quality or cost.


 
Reluctant in partnering with service providers.


 
(Systems) Integration:


 
Small amount of data or no details collected for defining the


 
transportation plan.


 
Little, or no information is gathered from freight bill for 


 
management reporting or other uses.


Competitive
Planning Approach:


Criteria:
Planning is done for multiple time horizons with 


 
varying time buckets and product levels.


 
Detailed planning tool for short term production scheduling.


 
Business requirements planning with integrated feedback 


 
loops; long-term planning reflects seasonality and cyclicality.


 
Primarily driven by demand-based (pull) scheduling 


 
techniques.


 
Inbound shipments are tracked and inbound loads are 


 
manually matched to outbound loads for the own fleet.


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Sort plans can be changed to some extent, based on a 


 
particular processing shift or time of year.


 
(Systems) Integration:


 
Facility-wide integration of production data.


 
Partners are provided with a rolling forecast of transportation


 
requirements monthly.


 
Accurate data available without the ability for real time report


 
generation.


 
Business-focused negotiation but regionally/locally-managed


 
relationships.


Market 
Planning Approach:


Leading
Simultaneous optimization of all planning activities.


Criteria:
Customer/partner input submitted for optimal cost/service 


 
trade-offs.


 
Short term requirements used to opportunistically 


 
shift modes, carriers, schedules.


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Sort plans can be changed based on the actual 


 
shipments, analyzing large data to determine the 


 
correct machine routings.


 
Automated transportation communication with 


 
partners and customers triggers flexible planning capabilities.


 
(Systems) Integration:


 
Integrated systems for all stages of operations, linked to 


 
inventory and materials planning - across the enterprise.


 
Production schedules integrated with customers to 


 
develop mutually beneficial planning horizons or 


 
to support JIT sourcing.


 
Create partnerships with service providers and share


 
productivity gains.


 
Excellent data available; contains complete, 


 
real-time production,


 
carrier and other relevant data.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 16


 


Scheduling


 




 




Description:
Scheduling deals with the operational planning for customer 


 
orders and pick up requests. This includes the creation of 


 
transport orders for every leg of a specific customer order 


 
and the allocation of orders to pre-build trips as well as 


 
ad-hoc transport planning especially for freight shipments.


 
Resources, like people, fleet, equipment or external 


 
partners/suppliers, are assigned to fulfill the planned 


 
transport and excess or missing capacity is traded on 


 
the spot market. Where required, detailed routing 


 
information is provided to execute a transport plan. 


 
Based on the planned transportation schedules, the 


 
production plans are reviewed and if necessary 


 
adjusted to address the actual transportation requirements.


Basic 
Scheduling Flexibility:


Criteria:
Vehicle routes are rather fixed for the defined planning 


 
period (e.g., bi-annually).


 
Basic constraints management with regular constraints 


 
identified and limited visibility to the schedulers.


 
Alternative schedules not possible (or very time consuming).


 
Scheduling alternatives only considered to address 


 
service/performance issues.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Scheduling is done locally or between few terminals.


 
Scheduling Considerations:


 
No time slotting in terminals.


 
Frequency as well as peak demand volumes and timing 


 
are not considered.


 
No formalized contingency plan in place.


 
Downstream fulfillment constraints (warehouse, 


 
shipping, etc.) are not considered.


 
Backhauls not considered when planning shipments.


Competitive
Scheduling Flexibility:


Criteria:
Maintenance slots, vacation, preferred teams are taken 


 
into account for scheduling.


 
Time windows are established for in/outbound traffic.


 
Guidelines for short term flexibility are defined and 


 
according schedule updates ensured.


 
Scheduling is regularly reviewed and adjusted.


 
Overcapacity is actively managed between terminals.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Scheduling of vehicles is performed on a regional level.


 
Scheduling Considerations:


 
Capacity utilization is monitored.


 
Resources (vehicles, equipment, human resources) are 


 
categorized and classified and mapped with detailed 


 
criteria in order to fulfill the demand.


 
Contingency plan based on experience and personal 


 
contacts rather than contracts.


 
Maintenance slots, vacation, preferred teams are taken 


 
into account for scheduling. Time windows are 


 
established for in/outbound traffic.


Market 
Scheduling Flexibility:


Leading
Short term capacity forecasts are used to 


Criteria:
opportunistically shift modes, carriers and schedules.


 
Automated scheduling forecast based on orders and 


 
bookings - bottlenecks are proactively managed; time 


 
windows are scheduled to the half hour.


 
Continuous planning cycle which can quickly react 


 
to changes in forecasts or other parameters.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Scheduling of vehicles is done on regional or global level.


 
Scheduling Considerations:


 
Customer/partner input for optimal cost/service 


 
trade-offs is used.


 
Documented contingency plans for action. Alternative 


 
relationships developed.


 
Centralized and automated rule-based dynamic routing


 
and scheduling.


 
Advanced constraints such as business objectives, 


 
customer priorities, financial impact, and alternate 


 
routings are optimized.


Description:
Scheduling deals with the operational planning for 


 
customer orders and pick up requests. This includes 


 
the creation of transport orders for every leg of a specific


 
customer order and the allocation of orders to pre-build


 
trips as well as ad-hoc transport planning especially for 


 
freight shipments.


 
Resources, like people, fleet, equipment or external


 
partners/suppliers, are assigned to fulfill the planned 


 
transport and excess or missing capacity is traded on 


 
the spot market. Where required, detailed routing 


 
information is provided to execute a transport plan.


 
Based on the planned transportation schedules, the 


 
production plans are reviewed and if necessary adjusted 


 
to address the actual transportation requirements.


Basic 
Scheduling Methods:


Criteria:
Manual and static schedules base on “intuitive” 


 
judgment and “works as always”. No continuous 


 
review of schedules.


 
Develop schedule without analytical tools/systems support.


 
Schedule bases on historical volumes (same period last year).


 
Standalone systems in place to plan and report on scheduling


 
operations.


 
Resource Assignment:


 
Human resources, equipment and vehicles are managed 


 
manually.


 
“Bottleneck” resources are viewed as common 


 
constraints across all product lines.


 
FTL/PTL Disposition:


 
FTL/PTL requests are checked and allocated manually.


 
Free spot capacities are offered informally.


Competitive
Scheduling Methods:


Criteria:
Simple optimization systems. Use of an analytical tool. 


 
Supporting Systems partially integrated.


 
What-if scenarios are validated against the concrete 


 
scheduled movements (based on historical data and 


 
expected growth).


 
Yearly review cycle to re-plan based on changes. 


 
Otherwise schedules are reviewed at “crisis” times


 
and changed to reflect short-term fluctuations.


 
Resource Assignment:


 
Human resources, equipment, vehicles are managed 


 
in the context of daily capacities.


 
Resources (vehicles, equipment, human resources) 


 
are categorized and classified and mapped with detailed 


 
criteria in order to fulfill the demand.


 
FTL/PTL Disposition:


 
FTL requests are checked and allocated manually and free 


 
spot capacities are offered informally.


 
Capacity utilization is actively monitored.


Market 
Scheduling Methods:


Leading
Scenario based computer-aided simulation: network 


Criteria:
management tool to establish parameters, EDI or web 


 
links to share real time informationon requirements and 


 
capacities.


 
Full systems integration (incl. analytical tools) allows 


 
consideration of all relevant areas/constraints.


 
Sophisticated scheduling capabilities available in order 


 
to link human resources, vehicles and equipment to daily


 
capacities taking all requirements into account.


 
Use of advanced optimization methods and 


 
algorithms with a holistic view of an entire operation.


 
Resource Assignment:


 
Locate and manage employees using real-time clocking 


 
information


 
Sophisticated scheduling capabilities available in order to 


 
link human resources, vehicles and equipment to daily 


 
capacities taking all requirements into account.


 
FTL/PTL Disposition:


 
Allocation of FTL requests automatically, just 


 
approval by dispatcher is required. Electronic support 


 
and integration with spot market where applicable.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 17


 


Labor Planning


 




 




Description:
Based on the required internal labor capacity, this capability 


 
deals with the planning of roster and shift schedules, planned 


 
resource availabilities to fill the determined slots and the 


 
management of peaks, adjustments and exceptions.


Basic 
Work Efficiency:


Criteria:
Labor efficiency is reviewed on a regular basis.


 
Employee Development:


 
Training foreseen on individual need. No structured employee


 
development.


 
Employee Satisfaction:


 
Team preferences are considered.


 
Planning Approach and Accuracy:


 
Jobs and positions are properly monitored. Required roles and


 
teams are properly foreseen to be scheduled.


 
Labor planning is aligned with scheduling.


 
Processing issues determined by managerial observation.


 
Employees managed and located by walking the shop floor.


 
Labor plan developed based on historical labor usage and 


 
manager requests; no performance reports.


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Shortages (e.g., illness) in staff are only managed in 


 
operations capabilities on ad-hoc basis.


 
Staff foreseen which is not always fully utilized in 


 
average and low peak time periods.


Competitive
Work Efficiency:


Criteria:
Labor efficiency is reviewed on continuous basis.


 
Results impact scheduling and mid-term roll-on/


 
roll-off requests to HR department.


 
Employee Development:


 
Thorough understanding of training requirements and 


 
actual training performed (incl. coaching).


 
Employee Satisfaction:


 
Vacation planning and vacation backlog taken into 


 
account for scheduling.


 
Planning Approach and Accuracy:


 
Considers long-term contracts, temporary employments, 


 
contracts or personnel from human resources agency.


 
Exact staffing levels are forecasted and additional human 


 
resource costs are managed.


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Processes and fall-back plans in place to eliminate 


 
unforeseen manpower shortages.


 
Part-time workers are used on ad-hoc basis to 


 
manage demand peaks.


Market 
Work Efficiency:


Leading
Efficiency tracking is automated and integrated with 


Criteria:
HR planning.


 
Employee Development:


 
Training curriculum for employees defined. 


 
Progress measured.


 
Employee Satisfaction:


 
Labor planning takes employee preferences into 


 
account (work-life balance).


 
Work time models are defined and implemented.


 
Planning Approach and Accuracy:


 
Long-term strategies are developed and they are 


 
refined with “what-if” scenarios.


 
Optimize utilizing advanced numerical 


 
methods and algorithms.


 
Optimized labor plan based on daily, weekly, and 


 
seasonal volume variability and union/specific labor rules.


 
Discover processing issues as they occur from real-time 


 
data and predict/prevent future issues.


 
Planning Flexibility:


 
Regional labor management, balancing between 


 
terminals and hubs or teams.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 18


 


Operations Management


 




 




Description:
The capability identifies critical business processes and 


 
establishes monitoring/reporting mechanisms (linked to 


 
track and trace and exception management capabilities) 


 
in order to enable seamless operations.


Basic Criteria:
Operations Visibility:


 
Little or no formal measurement approach or collection 


 
processes.


 
There is limited internal/external collaboration and 


 
optimization initiatives.


 
Simplistic measures, if any, for resource utilization.


 
Metrics are internally focused: terminal utilization, 


 
vehicle utilization and production variance.


 
Reporting Enablement:


 
Overall productivity, service, and cost measurements 


 
are tracked; performance to budget is reported.


 
Limited service objectives.


 
Performance measures are focused on individual 


 
performance and not related to business objectives.


 
Data passed between organizations is not automated.


 
All incidents are managed by phone or radio equipment.


 
Pro-active Monitoring:


 
Temporary teams are assembled to manage large-scale 


 
emergencies and disasters at individual nodes.


 
KPIs are measured monthly or quarterly.


 
Most exceptions are not known until a service target is 


 
missed.


Competitive
Operations Visibility:


Criteria:
Increased visibility into business processes, such as 


 
inventory, logistics and orders.


 
External partners' (Vendors/carriers) performance is 


 
tracked.


 
Reporting Enablement:


 
Individual department/operator productivity and 


 
quality measurements are tracked.


 
Integrated data from multiple systems within the 


 
enterprise are used to monitor key events in the 


 
supply chain.


 
Some semi-automated cost and service tracking against 


 
actual and budget.


 
Performance measures span the internal supply chain 


 
but mainly from a high level strategic perspective.


 
Nodes have systems that provide data from other nodes 


 
that can be used to anticipate deviations from plan.


 
Electronic communication with remote employees is 


 
possible over wide-area (at least mono-directional) 


 
hand-held device.


 
Pro-active Monitoring:


 
Coordination on exceptions between nodes at an area 


 
or district level.


 
Some key performance tracking (e.g., MPG, 


 
maintenance cost, etc.).


 
Internally set service goals.


 
Some ability to alter plans given sufficient notice of an 


 
exception.


Market Leading
Operations Visibility:


Criteria:
Detailed productivity, service, and quality measures across 


 
the organization and including third parties.


 
Reporting Enablement:


 
Reporting processes and systems allow activity-based cost 


 
reporting.


 
KPI's are tied to individual, department, and company 


 
performance goals.


 
Ability to integrate the bi-directional flow of data within 


 
key supply chain systems.


 
Central planning capabilities can fine-tune plans at 


 
upstream and downstream nodes to react to exceptions.


 
Incidents are managed by hand-held device and phone.


 
Pro-active Monitoring:


 
Exceptions at any node in the network are tracked and 


 
managed by specialized group or organization.


 
Preventive mechanisms and warnings support the 


 
dispatcher.


 
Automated response; rules can be established to trigger 


 
responses to alerts without human intervention.


 
Exceptions at one node trigger automatic notification to 


 
other nodes that will be impacted.


 
Operations metrics are communicated to/shared with 


 
key third parties (partners, customers, suppliers).


 








 

 
 



TABLE 19


 


Partner and Supplier Management


 




 




Description:
The capability contains all interaction-driven activities 


 
between an organization and its partners and suppliers 


 
from portfolio management and tender processing to 


 
relationship management.


Basic Criteria:
Integration:


 
No collaboration, e.g., partners/suppliers just execute 


 
parts of the transportation chain having only limited 


 
insight into service commitments originally made to 


 
customers, e.g., by 3PL.


 
Locally managed relationships by individual facilities, 


 
not integrated into wider network and/or limited 


 
flexibility to include regional differences.


 
Products or services are partially offered under the 


 
partner's brand.


 
Selection process:


 
Selection criteria is based on price and quality only.


 
Many partners and suppliers within the portfolio.


 
Establish and track Key Metrics:


 
Only cost and service/product delivery are tracked.


 
Internal and external Benchmarks:


 
No benchmarking analysis is carried out.


 
Performance Feedback:


 
No formal or scheduled feedback takes place with 


 
suppliers. Supplier is contacted only when a problem 


 
occurs.


Competitive
Integration:


Criteria:
Suppliers and partners are beginning to act strategically; 


 
they give more insight into their capabilities and flexibility 


 
options, work on common cost optimization goals (e.g., 


 
under/over capacities) and have full understanding of 


 
their responsibilities.


 
Detailed mutual understanding of activities and related 


 
costs.


 
Regionally managed relationships under common business 


 
umbrella.


 
Selection process:


 
Reduced number of partners or suppliers selected 


 
according to strategic or at least tactical goals set.


 
Strategic sourcing has reduced partners/suppliers but 


 
results are not communicated to users; “non-approved” 


 
companies are still utilized.


 
Business users are involved into the selection process.


 
Establish and track Key Metrics:


 
Quality, lead-time and delivery measures are commonly 


 
tracked in ERP system with periodic reviews to spot and 


 
improve on performance opportunities.


 
Internal and external Benchmarks:


 
Performance is measured against industry benchmarks.


 
Performance Feedback:


 
Specified feedback is shared with individual suppliers.


 
Feedback is tied directly to corporate goals.


Market Leading
Integration:


Criteria:
Partners and suppliers are integrated along the value chain 


 
into customer feedback analysis, failure analysis and other 


 
key functions.


 
Shared/integrated systems.


 
Collaboration in the realization of complex logistics 


 
solutions as well as in related strategic decisions.


 
Selection process:


 
Identification and selection takes place with emphasis 


 
placed on willingness/ability to develop long-term 


 
strategic relationship.


 
Selection criteria reflects a mix of requirements (service, 


 
cost, reliability, technology, etc.).


 
Sourcing of non-strategic goods/services outsourced to 


 
third party aggregator or procurement service provider.


 
Establish and track Key Metrics:


 
Key metrics are tracked globally, consolidated; real-time 


 
reporting.


 
Partners and suppliers track their own metrics, share and 


 
reconcile, and react pro-actively as necessary.


 
Internal and external Benchmarks:


 
Measurement against external benchmarks and against 


 
available partner/supplier base.


 
Performance Feedback:


 
Scorecard is provided at set frequency.


 
Continuous communication with partners/suppliers to 


 
improve efficiency or service levels and to drive 


 
innovations.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 20


 


Settlement


 




 




Description:
This capability describes monetary third party 


 
(supplier/partner and inter-/intracompany) settlement 


 
procedures for exchanged products or services: receiving, 


 
validating, preparing and sending settlements as well as 


 
clearing accounts through sending or receiving payments.


Basic Criteria:
Invoicing Mode:


 
Third parties invoices are checked manually.


 
No consolidation of transactions: multiple invoices from 


 
one partner/supplier per run.


 
Multiple settlement interface points within a region.


 
Accounts payable processes are disbursed throughout the 


 
organization (invoicing, approval).


 
Invoicing Options:


 
Third party partners can be invoiced on shipment level.


 
Restrictions in rate calculation of basic or additional 


 
services: Services are rated stand-alone having no 


 
dependencies with other services.


 
Data, Archiving and Investigation:


 
Third party supplier invoices are archived in local or a 


 
central facility and can be obtained on request.


 
Copies of each (paper-based) invoice is made and 


 
stored at multiple locations or departments.


 
Master data only optimized when errors detected.


 
Process Flexibility:


 
Departments are owners of the processes—errors are 


 
corrected at the back-end; much time spent chasing 


 
small-value items.


Competitive
Invoicing Mode:


Criteria:
Third parties can use self-invoicing. The third party has 


 
to check the invoice if it is correct.


 
Approval process in place but not rigidly followed.


 
The most common transactions can be managed 


 
electronically with the bigger partners.


 
Reduced, but still multiple settlement interface points 


 
within a region.


 
Invoicing Options:


 
Partners or third parties can be invoiced on other than 


 
shipment level, e.g., by stops performed during pick-up 


 
and delivery services.


 
Settlement customization is possible for key partners/


 
suppliers, e.g., invoicing separately for each business unit.


 
Outsourced invoice printing and distribution has been 


 
considered.


 
Data, Archiving and Investigation:


 
Third party invoices can be optically scanned and 


 
archived. Archived invoices can be viewed by staff 


 
and customer service.


 
Process Flexibility:


 
Not provided customer payments can be charged 


 
directly against the third party.


 
Invoicing is fully flexible to any pricing model, including 


 
dependencies between services. Discounts can be on a 


 
sophisticate level (e.g., service, bundle or event).


Market Leading
Invoicing Mode:


Criteria:
Electronic settlement is implemented. Full electronic 


 
payment and transaction management (e.g., transactions 


 
according to Bill of Lading).


 
Paper-based settlement is not needed anymore, payment 


 
can be made from EDI information.


 
Online approval for exception invoices over 


 
predetermined tolerances is common.


 
View purchasing and payables as one seamless process 


 
versus two distinct organizations.


 
Invoicing Options:


 
Settlement can take place for all services provided 


 
within a region or globally.


 
Invoice-less processing through use of ERS 


 
(evaluated receipts settlement where payment is made 


 
after matching receipt to purchase order).


 
Allow suppliers access to view status of payments.


 
Data, Archiving and Investigation:


 
Third party invoices can be obtained/viewed by the 


 
partner/supplier (self-invoicing) over the most 


 
important distribution channels.


 
Process Flexibility:


 
Complex rating rules are supported like multi-


 
dimensional tariffs, time bands and event segmentation.


 
Tariff changes can be applied within settlement period.


 





The following Tables 21-23 provide a continuing explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the enablement platform 104, and in particular, criteria for a sub-platform referred to as asset management.



 

 
 



TABLE 21


 


Facility Management (Asset Management)


 




 




Description:
The capability describes the management of terminals, 


 
hubs, offices, cleaning, water, maintenance, or electricity. 


 
The facility portfolio is maintained and in- or 


 
disinvestment decisions are taken.


Basic Criteria:
Sourcing Model:


 
All facilities are property of the operator. Facility 


 
Management performed in-house and locally.


 
Facility Design:


 
Evolutionary layout/expansion.


 
Asset Evaluation:


 
Facilities are only evaluated with their booked value. 


 
No strategy or plan for asset portfolio. No assessment 


 
of market conditions is performed.


 
Security:


 
Facilities are just secured by entry checks. Non-


 
electronic badges.


 
Quality:


 
Facility maintenance services are locally hired resources. 


 
Individuals are working on best personal knowledge.


 
Operations:


 
No leverage on purchasing power. No facility 


 
deployment plan. Stand alone process or system to track 


 
and manage facility information.


 
Monitor and track facility occasionally.


 
No fragmented alignment with Capacity Planning, 


 
Network Planning and Scheduling.


Competitive
Sourcing Model:


Criteria:
Sell and lease back of facilities has been evaluated. 


 
Procurement takes place against a master business plan.


 
Facility Design:


 
For new facilities optimized layouts and design are 


 
implemented according to productivity and efficiency 


 
requirements.


 
Asset Evaluation:


 
Develop a sound understanding of a facility's economic 


 
life.


 
Security:


 
Usage of electronic badges with key functionality and 


 
security concept based on roles.


 
Quality:


 
Quality guidelines and inspection schedules for cleaning, 


 
catering, heating and sanitation are defined. Resources 


 
can be internal or external.


 
Operations:


 
Deployment is planned according to facility type. 


 
Facilities are regularly monitored in automated ways.


 
Limited alignment with Capacity Planning, Network 


 
Planning and Scheduling.


Market Leading
Sourcing Model:


Criteria:
Facility management itself is outsourced.


 
Facility Design:


 
Layout of facilities is designed for optimal handling 


 
capabilities and maximum throughput in processing 


 
facilities.


 
Warehouses and Storage locations are optimized in 


 
layout for storing goods.


 
Asset composition is aligned with market and sales 


 
strategy.


 
Asset Evaluation:


 
Regular market evaluation is performed in order to 


 
understand current value of available facilities. 


 
Financial analysis of optimum P&L impact taking 


 
account of cash flow objectives.


 
Security:


 
Security concept foresees biometric access checks for 


 
key/sensitive areas.


 
Quality:


 
External service provider is managed based on service 


 
level agreements.


 
Operations:


 
Advanced tools and technologies are used to manage 


 
and track asset.


 
Focus on service level, cost control and competitive 


 
advantage.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 22


 


Fleet and Equipment Management (Asset Management)


 




 




Description:
The capability describes the management of trucks, 


 
trailers, loading devices like containers, as well fork 


 
lifts, pallets, boxes, cages, tour devices. The fleet and 


 
equipment portfolio is maintained and in- or 


 
disinvestment decisions are taken.


Basic Criteria:
Sourcing Model:


 
All vehicles and equipment are property of the operator 


 
and are managed in-house.


 
Limited leverage on purchasing power.


 
Alignment:


 
No alignment with Capacity Planning, Network 


 
Planning, Scheduling, Maintenance, Repair and 


 
Overhaul capabilities.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Local and inconsistent fleet and equipment management.


 
Efficiency:


 
No consistent fleet and equipment management; manual 


 
and irregular tracking.


 
Fleet and equipment is very fragmented or homogeneous 


 
over the facilities, asset portfolio managed reactively.


 
Poor asset utilization, significant detention and loss; asset 


 
disposal upon convenience.


 
No asset deployment procedure available.


 
No limited asset lifecycle management and systems 


 
support for ALM and/or tracking.


 
Demurrage/Balancing of Loading Devices:


 
Manual and inconsistent management of demurrage 


 
and fees for loading helps, etc.


 
Staff loses overview on loading devices. Claims 


 
because customer's loading devices not send back.


Competitive
Sourcing:


Criteria:
Outsourcing and leasing have been considered as 


 
management and sourcing options.


 
Alignment Limited alignment with corporate goals 


 
and Maintenance, Repair and Overhaul capabilities. 


 
Incorporation of network requirements.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Regional fleet and equipment management, balancing 


 
between facilities.


 
Efficiency:


 
Consequent fleet and equipment management: reduced 


 
fleet and equipment types, incorporation of network 


 
requirements.


 
Key performance tracking in place. Periodic reviews 


 
are performed.


 
Demurrage/Balancing of Loading Devices:


 
Process for demurrage and loading device exchange 


 
with customers and partners manually but consistently 


 
executed.


Market Leading
Sourcing:


Criteria:
Out-/in-sourcing of fleet management is actively managed.


 
Asset portfolio (plan) fully aligned with market/sales 


 
strategy. Asset leases included in asset portfolio.


 
Procurement strategy with formalized bid process and 


 
strong relationship with asset vendors.


 
Alignment A well articulated fleet and equipment 


 
strategy is in place aligned with the Capacity Planning, 


 
Network Planning, Scheduling and Operations capabilities, 


 
market and fleet strategy.


 
Geographical Range:


 
Central fleet and equipment management with full insight 


 
into available assets.


 
Efficiency:


 
Full ALM and reutilization management of fleet and 


 
equipment assets.


 
Focus on service level, cost control and competitive 


 
advantage. Mixed fleet tied to requirements, rationalized 


 
network.


 
Advanced tools and technologies to manage and track 


 
assets.


 
System support integrated to planning functions.


 
Demurrage/Balancing of Loading Devices:


 
Automatic determination of demurrage fees and 


 
exchange balances of loading devices with 


 
customers and partners.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 23


 


Maintenance, Repair and Overhaul (MRO) (Asset Management)


 




 




Description:
The capability contains ad-hoc as well as planned and 


 
regular maintenance, repair and overhaul activities of 


 
fleet and equipment.


Basic Criteria:
Supervision:


 
Part-time manager. Shared, internal maintenance 


 
resources.


 
Productivity and Performance Tracking:


 
Manual, paper based.


 
No equipment, parts, and performance standards. 


 
No formal productivity measurement. No mechanic 


 
standards.


 
Cost Controlling:


 
Maintenance costs captured and tracked on aggregate 


 
level in broad categories.


 
Process Quality:


 
Equipment replaced when it breaks down or becomes 


 
too expensive to repair.


 
Spare Parts:


 
Forecasting non-existent or based on simple historical 


 
stocking levels. Each location responsible for planning 


 
and procuring their own spares, limited leverage of 


 
purchasing power.


 
Manual, paper driven records keeping for parts inventory.


Competitive
Supervision:


Criteria:
Full-time maintenance supervisor reports to operations 


 
manager.


 
Some outsourcing of MRO activities is performed.


 
Productivity and Performance Tracking:


 
Computerized maintenance records and warranty 


 
tracking. Begin automation of spare parts bank.


 
Cost Controlling:


 
Costs tracked by vehicle in major categories. Maintenance


 
efficiency tracking (implies standards).


 
Process Quality:


 
Time, mileage, age-based scheduling. Annual maintenance


 
schedules are available.


 
History-based rules on asset life; exceptions accepted. 


 
Beginning to implement statistical life-cycle modeling.


 
Spare Parts:


 
Begin of automating parts bank, reduce slow turning 


 
parts Inventory and service targets set with regular 


 
performance assessment.


 
Use of forecasting tools that incorporate parameters 


 
such as mean time between failure to develop stock levels.


 
Ability to share spare parts on an emergency basis; some 


 
equipment and parts standards developed.


Market Leading
Supervision:


Criteria:
Maintenance supervisor responsible for “profit/loss” 


 
performance of operation or outsourced MRO service 


 
provider's performance.


 
Productivity and Performance Tracking:


 
Standards based on thorough analysis and industry 


 
research.


 
Automated tracking of standardized spare parts 


 
inventory.


 
Cost Controlling:


 
Monthly reports detail costs by age, make, model 


 
in specific categories, with anticipated variance and 


 
exceptions bulletins.


 
Process Quality:


 
Proactive scheduling of preventive maintenance 


 
based on forecast failures, on-board diagnostics.


 
Statistical life-cycle analysis can forecast failures 


 
and determine acquisition and divestiture policies.


 
Spare Parts:


 
Spare parts are planned and administered across 


 
the entire network, with stocking strategies based 


 
on demand volume.


 
Performance standards developed through internal 


 
analysis and industry research for all equipment 


 
and major parts.


 
Fast moving parts held in “consignment”; reorder/


 
replenishment handled by supplier.


 





The following Tables 24-26 provide a continuing explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the enablement platform 102, and in particular, criteria for a sub-platform referred to as information and data management.



 

 
 



TABLE 24


 


Master Data Management (Information and Data Management)


 




 




Description:
This capability deals with master and transactional data 


 
management as well as with address data and 


 
documents management.


 
Master Data Management includes the compilation of 


 
a corporate model, ownership, cleansing, maintenance, 


 
replication and purging of master and transactional data.


Basic Criteria:
Master Data Distribution and Maintenance:


 
Master data is maintained in the diverse applications, 


 
creating redundancies.


 
Customer data management is distributed and account 


 
data has to be entered several times in the different 


 
applications.


 
Individuals create useful processes, but no standard 


 
procedures exist across groups or locations.


 
Tools tend to be general-purpose software (Microsoft 


 
Excel, Microsoft Access) and no intensive data 


 
management software is in use.


 
Most data is not integrated, but some departments attempt 


 
integration efforts.


 
No data profiling, analysis, or auditing is used to 


 
determine data characteristics.


 
Data cleansing or standardization may occur in isolated 


 
areas or data sources.


 
Attempts to consolidate data (such as a data warehouse) 


 
requires scrap and rework due to data quality issues.


 
Data Security:


 
No official data privacy policy in place, which severely 


 
limits data sharing within the organization.


 
Security is controlled at line of business level.


Competitive
Master Data Distribution and Maintenance:


Criteria:
Shared master data layer provides a central repository 


 
for customer master data and references.


 
Data is standardized, consistent and measurable.


 
The most frequent updated data entities are replicated 


 
automatically to the listening systems.


 
Management understands and appreciates the role of 


 
data management in corporate initiatives.


 
Data management technology providers become strategic 


 
partners with the organization.


 
A dedicated corporate data management group maintains 


 
corporate data definitions, synonyms, business rules, and 


 
business value for data elements.


 
Enterprise data architects evaluate extensions of the 


 
shared master data layer and cost/benefit of application 


 
integration.


 
Data management goals shift from problem correction 


 
to problem prevention.


 
Ongoing data audits and data monitoring help the 


 
company maintain data integrity over time.


 
Relational data stores with integrated selection mechanism 


 
are used to feed analysis extracts.


 
Data Security:


 
An official data privacy policy in place.


 
Centralized security process and standards.


 
Access is controlled by role and authority.


Market Leading
Master Data Distribution and Maintenance:


Criteria:
Request/approval process for data exits.


 
Full definition and buy-in which data can be maintained 


 
by enterprise hierarchy level.


 
Data quality improvement has executive-level sponsorship. 


 
“Zero defect” policies for data collection and management 


 
are in place.


 
Procedures help the organization achieve the highest levels 


 
of data integrity.


 
Corporate data management tools are standardized.


 
All aspects of the organizations utilized the standard 


 
metadata and rules definitions created and maintained 


 
by the data management group.


 
Data models capture the business meaning and technical 


 
details of all corporate data elements.


 
Processes for continuous improvement of customer data 


 
and consolidation of customer accounts are available.


 
There is minimal data redundancy (duplicates <= 2%).


 
Data Security:


 
Data privacy policy is clearly communicated to customers.


 
Potential security violations are actively investigated.


 
Access is controlled by role and authority.


 
Security systems and policies are routinely audited to 


 
ensure they are functioning as intended.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 25


 


Address Management (Information and Data Management)


 




 




Description:
This capability deals with master and transactional data 


 
management as well as with address data and documents 


 
management.


 
Address data management deals with collection, cleansing, 


 
filtering, and usage of address data within the logistical 


 
core processes as well as for additional services.


Basic Criteria:
Address Data Distribution and Maintenance:


 
Address changes are re-active, initiated by carriers as 


 
they identify undeliverable mail.


 
New addresses are requested by residents and businesses.


 
Addresses are maintained in multiple systems.


 
New addresses take several weeks to synchronize across 


 
systems automated sorting center systems.


 
No de-duplication, address or name standardization, or 


 
other data cleansing methods are internally applied.


 
Duplicate individual and household records exist at all 


 
sub-system levels.


 
External agencies used to support data matching and 


 
address standardization/validation.


 
No sharing of address data; mail clients develop and 


 
use separate mailing lists.


Competitive
Address Data Distribution and Maintenance:


Criteria:
Address changes are initiated by consumers/clients 


 
via a non-automated process.


 
Addresses are maintained in a central repository, and 


 
each internal entity has access to import/use the data 


 
according to their needs.


 
Addresses are shared with large mailing clients on 


 
a periodic basis.


 
Some de-duplication, address, or name standardization 


 
is in place.


 
Data cleansing performed primarily in reaction to 


 
errors spotted.


 
Individual and household consolidation processes 


 
executed on a periodic basis.


Market Leading
Address Data Distribution and Maintenance:


Criteria:
Address changes are made in near real-time by


 
customers/partners/suppliers via Internet.


 
New addresses are setup through integrated processes 


 
with municipal planning and zoning entities.


 
Address additions and changes are automatically 


 
integrated at all levels of the supply chain, from 


 
sorting center machines to delivery unit management 


 
systems.


 
Dynamic data cleansing and consolidation exists at 


 
sub-system and repository levels.


 
Address data is synchronized daily.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 26


 


Document Management (Information and Data Management)


 




 




Description:
This capability deals with master and transactional data 


 
management as well as with address data and 


 
documents management.


 
Document management focuses on provision of 


 
standard documents and templates as well as 


 
workflow procedures and archiving of electronically 


 
and physical documents.


Basic Criteria:
Document Management:


 
The document generation process is manual.


 
No common procedures to manage documentation 


 
changes.


 
Difficulty to find the last version of documents. Project 


 
documentation is not synchronized with product 


 
information.


 
Document exchange with customers or partners is 


 
a manual process.


 
Inventory of document types, formats and applications 


 
across enterprise are not consistent.


 
Archiving of paper documents is done completely manual 


 
in local facilities. If a document is needed is must be send 


 
by FAX, original document or copy of document.


Competitive
Document Management:


Criteria:
Some processes are developed to automatically generate 


 
documentation with updated product information.


 
Use of standardized document folders and templates 


 
across some product configuration elements.


 
Document search cannot be executed across multiple 


 
disparate data sources.


 
Basic document management system capabilities are 


 
in place.


 
Archiving is outsourced (non knowledge).


 
Documents are archived using optical scan.


 
Document access according to user's role and data 


 
protection guidelines.


Market Leading
Document Management:


Criteria:
Development of a process that automatically generates 


 
the documentation with updated product information.


 
Standardized document folders and templates with 


 
reference to product configuration elements.


 
Improved change management by using a structured 


 
process.


 
Integrate project documentation in a single document 


 
repository with a classification system that facilitates 


 
document search.


 
Advanced document management capabilities. 


 
Electronic consolidation and forwarding of suppliers 


 
invoices to customers.


 
Archiving is fully integrated in the workflow of 


 
document management.


 
Archiving system is certified against international 


 
standards


 





The following Table 27 provides an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the contract management platform 110.



 

 
 



TABLE 27


 


Contract Management


 




 




Description:
This capability involves all the activities that are 


 
required to prepare, negotiate, process and manage 


 
contracts. It further outlines the importance of


 
standardizing contract structures and linking them 


 
into corporate-wide tariff and pricing grids.


Basic Criteria:
Contract price, terms, and conditions differ from 


 
site to site for the same items.


 
There is merely any contract standardization.


 
Paper contracts exist, but requestors are unclear


 
who preferred suppliers are.


 
Little electronic management of contracts. Printed 


 
documents travel via mail or fax for editing and 


 
approvals requiring manual data entry.


 
Disparate systems for customer and contract data.


 
There is no integration of contract data, tariff/


 
pricing grids, and booking/order management.


 
Individual purchase orders created without


 
reference to master contract or blanket PO.


Competitive
Long-term, company wide contracts exist for some


Criteria:
key items and customers/suppliers/partners.


 
Various contract types and blanket purchase orders 


 
established.


 
third party contracts are viewed as business 


 
relationships whose goals are aligned with


 
yours, sharing both risks and rewards.


 
Formal standardized service level agreements exist 


 
and are electronically implemented.


 
Customer and contract data are hosted in the same 


 
system.


 
Customer insight is available to support contract 


 
extension.


Market Leading
Global standardized contracts are in place; use is


Criteria:
mandatory.


 
Blanket PO use replaced by procurement cards 


 
and eProcurement.


 
Service management framework is in place which 


 
provides effective operations and continuous 


 
improvement.


 
Guaranteed business benefits sustained over 


 
period of contract and are electronically 


 
monitored.


 
Electronic exchange and approval with customers 


 
on their contracts is in place.


 
Contract data can directly be interfaced with the


 
billing system making real time adoption of


 
contracts feasible.


 





The following Tables 28-32 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the mail operations platform 112.



 

 
 



TABLE 28


 


Mail Production


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all processes related


 
to producing a mailing for a customer from


 
gathering content requirements to finally printing


 
and packaging the mailing. The mailing may be


 
produced as a one time event or it could be


 
regularly scheduled.


Basic Criteria:
Mailing Plan Development:


 
Customer requirements are collected manually


 
No pre-scheduling for mail production based on 


 
the requirement collected.


 
Mailing Design Development:


 
No template or historical working product can be


 
used for mailing design.


 
Mailing Data:


 
Collected from mailer through different ways, e.g.,


 
email.


 
Mail Induction Planning:


 
No advance preparation or planning for the induc-


 
tion of the mailing.


Competitive
Mailing Plan Development:


Criteria:
Created based on customer requirement on an ad-


 
hoc basis.


 
Customer requirements are collected through 


 
multiple ways, e.g., web, phone.


 
Mailing Design Development:


 
Database in place to store the historical template 


 
or design product of the customer to save the 


 
effort for mailing design.


 
Mailing Data:


 
Data from mailer are merged into mailing with 


 
standard tools pre-defined.


 
Store mailing details so they can be leveraged if the


 
requirements are similar or the same for future 


 
mailings.


Market Leading
Mailing Plan Development:


Criteria:
Historical data is used for forecasting the large 


 
mailing in advance.


 
Requirement confirmation is taken place proactively 


 
to make sure requirement are fully understood.


 
Mailing Design Development:


 
Suggestion are given to customer with personalized 


 
design feature as a value add service.


 
Mailing Data:


 
Data integration between postal and large mailer 


 
smoothes the process or mailing creation.


 
Mail Induction Planning:


 
Induction is planned in advance so that some mailing 


 
does not have to go through the acceptance stage, 


 
e.g., determine point of induction and how mail 


 
should be packaged for induction.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 29


 


Mail Preparation


 




 




Description:
This capability area focuses on preparing the mailing 


 
for induction. All processes that must be executed


 
prior to induction to allow mail to travel from origin


 
to destination including address verification, address


 
application, postage application and mail presortation.


Basic Criteria:
Mailing List Generation:


 
Based on the customer requirement, e.g., demographic 


 
or geographic type information.


 
Level of Pre-sorting:


 
No pre-sorting is performed.


 
No verification for the address list.


 
Label Design:


 
Basic label options are provided to customer as 


 
choices.


 
Postage Options:


 
Postal standard postage are provided as the only


 
option.


Competitive
Mailing List Generation:


Criteria:
Multiple queries can be performed depending 


 
on the type of mailing list.


 
Data formatting can be performed based on the 


 
customer requirement.


 
Level of Pre-sorting:


 
Presortation list is created based on the point of 


 
induction and level of presort required.


 
Label Design:


 
Labels are designed based on the customized 


 
requirements from customer.


 
Postage Options:


 
Some types of postage will allow for a flexible 


 
design that might be specific to the mailer.


Market Leading
Mailing List Generation:


Criteria:
Personalized customer data can be retrieved 


 
from postal database as a value added


 
service provide to large mailer.


 
Detailed verification are performed on the


 
address list, e.g., post code, country, city, 


 
street name, street number, apartment/unit/


 
suite number and potentially occupant name.


 
Level of Pre-sorting:


 
Mailer are encouraged to do the presortation


 
by themselves and pay less.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 30


 


Acceptance and Induction


 




 




Description:
The Acceptance capability area includes all processes 


 
that involve taking possession of the mail for subse-


 
quent processing. It also includes the transfer of


 
electronic mailing data before the mailing is actually 


 
physically handed over to the post. The Induction


 
capability area focuses on those processes that are


 
executed when the mail is physically handed over to 


 
the post. Revenue protection is a key process within


 
this capability where large volume mailings are 


 
verified to ensure proper payment.


Basic Criteria:
Mailer Communications:


 
No communication between acceptance units and 


 
large mailers until mailings arrive.


 
Mail Collection Services:


 
Only available in collection boxes and retails office; 


 
there is no differentiate service for large mailers.


 
Revenue Verification:


 
No process to change degree of audit from customer 


 
to customer.


 
The cost associated with recovering outstanding 


 
revenue does not justify collecting the outstanding 


 
accounts.


 
Payment Receipt:


 
Payment parameters with customers are not enforced.


Competitive
Mailer Communications:


Criteria:
Large mailer receiving includes some level of sched-


 
uling and pre-advice.


 
Mail Collection Services:


 
Large mailer acceptance units are set up especially 


 
for them and large mailer are encourage to use those 


 
units for more convenient and tailored service.


 
Revenue Verification:


 
Revenue audit process varies from customer to 


 
customer depending on historical information that is 


 
not stored and analyzed.


 
Payment Receipt:


 
Organization has limited ability to pursue clients 


 
with outstanding accounts.


Market Leading
Mailer Communications:


Criteria:
Large mailer receiving system used to schedule 


 
mailers and collect pre-advice data about their 


 
mailings.


 
Mail Collection Services:


 
Maximum accessibility (i.e. - collection boxes, 


 
retail offices, large mailer acceptance units, etc.).


 
Revenue Verification:


 
Optimal volume collected in each collection 


 
instance and at each acceptance unit.


 
Revenue audit process systemically modified 


 
and expedited depending on customer information.


 
Minimize lost revenue by verifying high risk mail 


 
and auditing a reasonable percentage of general mail.


 
Payment Receipt:


 
The organization has an integrated payment process 


 
with tier 1 clients and the other clients are managed


 
on a tight payment schedule.


 
Mail Volume:


 
Minimum volatility associated with inefficient 


 
processes and poorly controlled entry timing


 
of verified mail into the supply chain.


 
Optimize entry of verified mail to sort operations 


 
by minimizing variances in planned volume 


 
arrival profiles (VAP).


 
Minimum volatility in mail consolidation levels to 


 
expedite downstream sort operations.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 31


 


Mail Sorting


 




 




Description:
This capability area involves manual or mechanical 


 
separation of items according to a particular charac-


 
teristic or marking on the mail item. It also includes


 
those processes to deal with exceptions when the 


 
mail cannot be sorted at all. For general handling


 
and sorting processes refer to the Transportation 


 
platform - Handling and Sorting


Basic Criteria:
Issue Resolution:


 
Operators do not have the ability to fix sortation 


 
issues. They are only able to apply temporary 


 
fixes to the problems.


 
Pre-sorting Discounts:


 
No preferential policy in place for pre-sorted mail.


 
Address Verification:


 
Receiver's address is manually identified and sorted.


 
Sortation Method:


 
Sortation is done using static sort plans by product 


 
type based on the destination address.


 
Highly skilled workers perform sortation, with deep 


 
skills in address recognition.


 
Sortation is mostly manual with very little to no 


 
automation.


 
Cause of Missorts:


 
The number of missorts is high and could be 


 
prevented by improvements in upstream


 
processes.


Competitive
Issue Resolution:


Criteria:
Operators have limited ability to fix sortation issues.


 
Operators have the visibility to mail inflow and they 


 
intermittently plan production schedules.


 
Pre-sorting Discounts:


 
Commissions are given to those presorted mails to 


 
improve the percentage of mail properly prepared.


 
Address Verification:


 
Advanced technology is used to scan and identify 


 
the receiver's address automatically.


 
Sortation Method:


 
Manual sortation is still executed based on static sort


 
plans but automated sortation is more dynamic and 


 
not necessarily by product or based on the destination


 
address. Although sorting based on the destination 


 
address is still the most prevalent method.


 
Sortation is automated for most products but there is


 
still a large amount of manual sorting done.


 
Cause of Missorts:


 
Missorts are mostly attributed to errors made by the 


 
automated readers or a customer's failure to follow 


 
addressing guidelines.


Market Leading
Issue Resolution:


Criteria:
Operators are continually viewing demand and adjust 


 
the production schedules to maximize facility produc-


 
tivity.


 
Operators are able to address mail sortation issues by 


 
analyzing root causes rather than implementing tem-


 
porary fixes.


 
Address Verification:


 
Maximize the quality and accuracy of the sorting 


 
process by correctly and quickly identifying the


 
receiver's address and referencing up-to-date 


 
address information.


 
Sortation Method:


 
Sortation is executed dynamically based on daily 


 
volumes using criteria other than only the


 
destination address.


 
Sortation is fully automated with manual processes 


 
in place to handle exceptions.


 
Upstream processes are streamlined with sortation 


 
processes to minimize errors in product classifica-


 
tion and assignment to sort plans.


 
Cause of Missorts:


 
Missorts are mostly attributed to errors made by 


 
the automated readers or a customer's failure to 


 
follow addressing guidelines.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 32


 


Mail Management


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes process groups that 


 
involve managing the mail for a customer usually


 
after the mail has been inducted into the mail


 
operations pipeline. These processes are typically 


 
value-added services that a post may offer to its


 
customers like scanning mail for hazardous


 
materials and managing their mailroom.


Basic Criteria:
Response Mail Handling:


 
Services are provided to collected the response 


 
mail from the customer on behalf of the mailer.


 
Redirecting Mail:


 
Redirect according to redirection requirement, 


 
e.g., change of address.


 
Holding Mail:


 
Mail is held only when the mail cannot be 


 
delivered. No hold mail service before the 


 
mail is physically delivered.


 
Hazardous Mail Handling:


 
Screen mail for hazardous substances, facilities 


 
are provided for scanning mail and information


 
are store, e.g., how many pieces where scanned 


 
and how many were hazardous.


Competitive
Response Mail Handling:


Criteria:
Detail plan and process are in place to manage 


 
the response mail, e.g., plan induction, build


 
sortation plan, etc.


 
Redirecting Mail:


 
Database is updated after mail is redirected by 


 
overwriting the existing address with the new,


 
redirected address.


 
Holding Mail:


 
Provide holding mail as a kind of service according 


 
to client requirements, e.g., duration of hold, where


 
to be held, occupant name, etc.


 
Mail Room Services:


 
Provided for interoffice, intraoffice mail transfer, 


 
including pickup, sorting, distribution, etc.


Market Leading
Response Mail Handling:


Criteria:
Post processing service is provided, e.g., open, read, 


 
analysis, store data from the response mail. Response 


 
mail data is distributed according to agreed on 


 
channels.


 
Redirecting Mail:


 
Sorting and updating the address of redirected mail 


 
is an entirely automated process, and does not


 
significantly affect the delivery date.


 
Holding Mail:


 
Address information, induction plan and sortation 


 
plan are all integration according to the requirement 


 
for holding mail.


 
Archiving Mail:


 
Detail process and advance tools are used for mail 


 
archive according to client requirement. Retrieve


 
mail at the customer's request.


 
Undeliverable Mail Handling:


 
Return mail according to the specific requirement of 


 
the mailer, either return the physical mail or a list of


 
addresses that failed to be delivered.


 





The following Tables 33-44 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the transportation platform 114.



 

 
 



TABLE 33


 


Dispatch


 




 




Description:
The capability covers load dispatching to propelled 


 
capacities (PUD truck, line haul, aircraft, train) or 


 
for consolidation to loading devices.


Basic Criteria:
Allocation:


 
Dispatch of pieces to capacities is performed manually


 
based on a static paper based allocation scheme.


 
There is no upstream and upfront information on dis-


 
patching volumes.


 
All paperwork is printed manually.


 
Daily load is optimized ad-hoc on dispatcher's experi-


 
ence.


 
No pre-departure check of shipments loaded is per-


 
formed.


 
Incident Management:


 
Incidents in transport operations are managed manually.


 
Dealing with incidents the dispatcher communicates 


 
over phone or radio equipment.


Competitive
Allocation:


Criteria:
Dispatcher is supported by a tool offering basic alloca- 


 
tion mechanisms, e.g., based on ZIP code.


 
Regular load can be allocated automatically and associ-


 
ated paperwork is printed automatically.


 
The dispatcher is supported by basic KPI overviews to 


 
re-allocate load efficiently.


 
Timeliness of dispatches is continuously improved by 


 
coordination of sort and transportation planning and


 
proper mode assignment.


 
Ad-hoc requests during the day are allocated manually.


 
Incident Management:


 
Electronic communication with remote employees is 


 
possible over wide-area (at least mono-directional) 


 
hand-held Device.


Market Leading
Allocation:


Criteria:
Sophisticated dispatch tool with advanced multi-


 
criterion allocation mechanisms is in place.


 
Automated dispatch systems integrated into other 


 
operating, administrative and financial systems 


 
(TMS/WMS).


 
The dispatch tool suggests optimization opportunities. 


 
The allocation scheme is optimized on statistical 


 
measures.


 
Operators ensure timeliness of dispatches by investi-


 
gation and coordination of sort and transportation


 
planning and proper mode assignment.


 
In Road Transport even ad-hoc pick-ups during the


 
day are sent directly to couriers on tour.


 
Allocation schemes allow for joint capacities of 


 
different divisions (Express, Freight).


 
Incident Management:


 
Preventive mechanisms and warnings support the 


 
dispatcher.


 
Electronic communication with remote employees 


 
using bi-directional hand-held device communica-


 
tion.


 
Documents printed by hand-held device and status


 
information is immediately exchanged with central


 
system when recorded.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 34


 


Pick-up and Receive


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all variations of road or railcar 


 
pick-up/reception/input of shipments, including all


 
pick-up activities starting with vehicle departure from 


 
and ending with re-arrival at the terminal/hub gate, or


 
direct receipt at facility for further processing.


Basic Criteria:
Flexibility:


 
Only pick-up tours are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
All work is performed based on paperwork handed 


 
over to the courier/driver.


 
The courier provides empty paper forms to shipper. 


 
These forms are filled out manually by the shipper.


 
Piece Tagging:


 
Piece tagging will be performed during unload of 


 
the pick-up truck in the terminal.


 
Navigation:


 
The courier/driver drives by experience and map.


 
Feature support:


 
Only pick-up is supported.


 
Status Recording:


 
Shipment status information is recorded manually 


 
or by scanning of documents during trip return.


Competitive
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Mixed pick-up and delivery tours are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
Customer sends order files electronically using 


 
customer automation system.


 
Additional paperwork like dangerous goods 


 
declaration or customs documents still managed 


 
manually.


 
Piece Tagging:


 
Pieces are already tagged by the shipper or 


 
preliminary label concept is used.


 
Navigation:


 
The courier drives by experience and map.


 
Feature support:


 
Remote pick-ups are supported (requirement 


 
for systems integration).


 
Loading device exchange is managed manually.


 
Status Recording:


 
Shipment status information is recorded manually 


 
or by scanning of documents during trip return.


Market Leading
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Pick-ups and delivery from multiple domains 


 
(freight, express) are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
Customer sends order files electronically using 


 
customer automation system, web site or full


 
ERP integration.


 
Additional paperwork is communicated electronically 


 
and only for legal reasons paper copies are handed


 
over to courier.


 
Piece Tagging:


 
Pieces are already labeled by the shipper or preliminary 


 
labels are used in order to give the customer a unique


 
reference on piece level.


 
Navigation:


 
The hand-held Device supports navigation and leads 


 
the courier with optimal efficiency to the pick-up


 
locations.


 
Feature support:


 
Sophisticated product features are supported using a 


 
mobile device: proper planning of additional load


 
times, pick-up feasibility, loading help management,


 
trailer management and courier meet pick-up/delivery;


 
real-time with updates and re-routes


 
Status Recording:


 
Tour feasibility and current status is confirmed using a 


 
hand-held device.


 
Wireless communication with central system during 


 
operations is enabled.


Description:
The capability covers all variations of road or railcar 


 
pick-up/reception/input of shipments, including all 


 
pick-up activities starting with vehicle departure from


 
and ending with re-arrival at the terminal/hub gate, or


 
direct receipt at facility for further processing.


Basic Criteria:
Trip Results:


 
Heavy post tour registration process in order to record 


 
trip results.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Payment reconciliation is done manually based on 


 
paperwork.


 
Performance Management:


 
No guidelines are in place for courier/driver 


 
performance.


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed only in case of 


 
bigger problems.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
All incidents and same day ad-hoc pick-ups are 


 
managed by phone or radio equipment.


Competitive
Trip Results:


Criteria:
Pick-ups are registered by pick-up un-load registration.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Payment reconciliation is supported by a system.


 
Performance Management:


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed based on 


 
manager experience.


 
Briefing guidelines are in place.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
All incidents are managed by phone or radio.


 
Ad-hoc pick-ups during the day can be received over 


 
hand-held Device.


 
Paper receipts are still filled out manual.


Market Leading
Trip Results:


Criteria:
Pick-up information from hand-held device loaded. No 


 
further registration in post trip necessary.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Quick payment reconciliation by using hand-held 


 
device information.


 
Performance Management:


 
Operational delivery performance is determined auto-


 
matically and service level agreement checks of sub-


 
contractors are performed as an input for the debrief.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
Incidents are managed by hand-held device and phone.


 
Ad-hoc pick-ups during the day can be received over 


 
hand-held Device.


 
Hand-held device is used to print receipts.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 35


 


Terminal Handling and Sorting-Handling


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all activities from vehicle 


 
reception at the gate, unloading, sorting, for-


 
warding and loading to releasing the vehicle


 
from the gate.


Basic Criteria:
Terminal Layout:


 
Terminal layout is taken as given.


 
No systematic alignment between network and 


 
local capacities.


 
Measurement:


 
Weight and dimensions are recorded manually 


 
and only sporadically or for non-conveyable 


 
traffic.


 
Dock Inventory:


 
Paper based dock inventory is performed.


 
Goods Management:


 
All leftover shipments remain in the bays after 


 
departure.


 
Transit Documentation:


 
Transit documents are just handed over manually 


 
by terminal staff.


Competitive
Terminal Layout:


Criteria:
Existing terminal layouts are individually optimized.


 
Measurement:


 
Weight and dimensions for conveyable traffic 


 
automatically recorded.


 
Dock Inventory:


 
Scan based dock inventory is performed.


 
Goods Management:


 
All leftover shipments are recorded with a leftover 


 
reason and checked in.


 
Dedicated secured places for dangerous or valuable 


 
goods.


 
Discrepancy reports are regularly run for quality 


 
improvements.


 
Transit Documentation:


 
Transit documents are managed manually.


 
Additional checks are performed by line haul 


 
management that all transit documents are 


 
properly forwarded.


Market Leading
Terminal Layout:


Criteria:
Terminal layouts of all terminals are efficiently 


 
designed in order to ensure quick handling.


 
Systematic and technology supported alignment 


 
between network and local capacities to ensure


 
minimum goods movements.


 
Measurement:


 
Weight and dimensions for conveyable traffic 


 
automatically recorded and updated in records.


 
Dock Inventory:


 
Scan based dock inventory is performed.


 
Miss-routings are monitored and reasons diminished.


 
Goods Management:


 
All leftover shipments are recorded with leftover 


 
reason and checked in.


 
Dedicated secured places for dangerous or valuable 


 
goods.


 
Special requirements goods are controlled (e.g., reefer 


 
cargo temperature).


 
Transit Documentation:


 
Transit document content is sent electronically to the 


 
dedicated receivers.


 
Paper based transit documents are stuck to pieces 


 
whenever possible.


 
Additional paperwork (e.g., dangerous goods) is


 
properly and efficiently sorted and forwarded to 


 
line haul driver.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 36


 


Terminal Handling and Sorting-Unloading/Loading


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all activities from vehicle recep- 


 
tion at the gate, unloading, sorting, forwarding and


 
loading to releasing the vehicle from the gate.


Basic Criteria:
Unloading/Loading a Vehicle:


 
Manual loading processes including generation of


 
shipping documents.


 
Loading helps getting short sometimes; qualification


 
for certain devices can be an efficiency limiting factor


 
(e.g., fork-lift or harbor crane).


 
Manual carton/pallet counts as they are loaded onto 


 
shipping vehicle.


 
100% QA checking of all shipments.


 
Operational safety guidelines are available, but rarely


 
supervised in a borderline way.


 
Hardly any terminal worker has a certification to handle 


 
special requirements goods (e.g., dango, gas, fluids, 


 
secured).


 
No electronic loading confirmation in place.


 
No communication to shipment consignee.


Competitive
Unloading/Loading a Vehicle:


Criteria:
RF dispatched loading of staged product, based on 


 
priority in task queue.


 
System suggested load sequence - based on product 


 
requirements and location min/max.


 
Loading helps are sufficiently available and accessible 


 
for every terminal worker. A sufficient number of 


 
loading personnel is qualified to use special loading 


 
devices.


 
System generated shipping documents.


 
Exception based QA checks; random check of loaded 


 
orders.


 
Operational safety guidelines are in place and are 


 
regularly checked and updated.


 
Shift supervisors and team leads have specific 


 
complementary special requirements goods


 
certifications (e.g., dango, gas, fluids, secured).


 
BOL and/or packlist is faxed to consignee after 


 
shipment is dispatched.


Market Leading
Unloading/Loading a Vehicle:


Criteria:
Load sequence is dictated by the customer order.


 
Load confirmation using RF in place.


 
Direct computer links to pickers via RF.


 
Productivity standards are measured by assignment.


 
Loading helps are considered being an efficiency 


 
driver. Devices are sufficiently available in top


 
conditions and a high number of terminal workers is


 
qualified to operate special devices (fork-lifts, 


 
cranes, etc.).


 
Bar coded container identification outlining pallet 


 
contents for mixed SKU pallets.


 
System directed random checks using SPC.


 
Operations safety is a key value. All terminal workers 


 
are equipped with specific safety apparel.


 
A high number of terminal workers have complemen-


 
tary special requirements goods certifications (e.g., 


 
dango, gas, fluids, secured).


 
ASN (advance shipping notice) delivered to consignee


 
as shipment is released.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 37


 


Terminal Handling and Sorting-Sorting


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all activities from vehicle reception 


 
at the gate, unloading, sorting, forwarding and loading to 


 
releasing the vehicle from the gate. For further mail 


 
specific sorting processes refer to the Mail 


 
Operations platform—Mail Sorting.


Basic Criteria:
Sorting:


 
Manual sorting only.


 
Mail focus:


 
Operators/loading personnel do not have the ability to 


 
fix sorting issues. They are only able to apply 


 
temporary fixes to the problems. 


 
No preferential policy in place for pre-sorted


 
mail. 


 
Receiver's address is manually identified and


 
sorted. 


 
There is only limited automation in the


 
process. 


 
Classification of mail is done by visual inspection.


 
Decoding of sort criteria is based on human 


 
knowledge of postal code data.


 
Manual processes in place to handle missorts 


 
that are labor intensive; missorts are high and are 


 
largely attributed to human errors.


 
Mail is cleared by operators only; when they 


 
see the operational fit; usually based on volumes.


Competitive
Sorting:


Criteria:
Use of sorting machines/belts for standard pieces 


 
(size within range) or only for specific pieces.


 
Mail focus:


 
Operators/loading personnel have limited ability to fix 


 
sorting issues.


 
Operators have the visibility to mail inflow and they 


 
intermittently adapt production schedules.


 
Commissions are given to those presorted mails to 


 
improve the percentage of mail properly prepared.


 
Sorting is automated for most products but there is still 


 
a large amount of manual sorting done.


 
Advanced technology is used to scan and identify the 


 
receiver's address automatically.


 
Addresses are validated using data that has been 


 
downloaded daily.


 
Some level of automation is involved in classifying 


 
the mail by scanning identification labels.


 
Missorts are mostly attributed to errors made by the 


 
automated readers or a customer's failure to follow 


 
addressing guidelines.


 
Processes to handle missorts are manual.


 
Clearing mail is still a manual process but has been 


 
partially planned out based on the production schedule.


 
Highly skilled workers are responsible for clearing the 


 
mail.


Market Leading
Sorting:


Criteria:
Using sorting machines/belts for standard pieces 


 
allowing for direct load from them.


 
Mail focus:


 
Sorting machines support wide range of pieces.


 
Container/Ship lading:


 
Terminal automation and marshalling is performed.


 
Operators/loading personnel are continually viewing 


 
demand and adjust the production schedules to 


 
maximize facility productivity.


 
Operators are able to address mail sorting issues by 


 
analyzing root causes rather than implementing 


 
temporary fixes.


 
Piece-embedded sort criteria (e.g., data glyphs) 


 
maximize quality and accuracy of the sorting process 


 
referencing up-to-date address information.


 
Sorting process speed is maximized to achieve 


 
improved customer service while minimizing the 


 
costs associated with sorting the mail.


 
Volume of missorts is small; most missorts are 


 
due to a customer's failure to follow addressing 


 
guidelines.


 
Mail is cleared only when necessary and depends 


 
on the separation volumes and the production schedule; 


 
clearance is performed fully automated in most cases.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 38


 


Terminal Handling and Sorting-Storage


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all activities from vehicle 


 
reception at the gate, unloading, sorting, forwarding 


 
and loading to releasing the vehicle from the gate. 


 
Related to storage activities along the shipments' flow 


 
through the value chain, differentiating from 


 
Warehousing.


Basic Criteria:
Storage Security:


 
Non-secured storage area is in place. No check-in/


 
check-out is performed.


 
Storage Inventory and Utilization:


 
Only basic storage guidelines are in place.


 
Storage Locations and Conditions:


 
Kind of goods not taken into account for storage 


 
location or conditions.


 
Inventory Facilities:


 
Physical storage is limited to stacking.


 
For more storage related input see Warehousing.


Competitive
Storage Security:


Criteria:
Secured and non-secured storage areas are in place. 


 
Pieces are checked-in/checked-out using scanning.


 
Storage Inventory and Utilization:


 
Manual storage inventory performed regularly.


 
Storage Locations and Conditions:


 
Dedicated storage areas for specific types of goods.


 
Inventory Facilities:


 
Use of shelving, case flow rack, etc., integrated into 


 
rack system. High density storage options including 


 
push-back, flow-thru, and double deep selective rack.


Market Leading
Storage Security:


Criteria:
System control to monitor and manage storage retention.


 
Storage Inventory and Utilization:


 
Storage bay utilization is monitored and storage layout 


 
adapted to goods needs. Storage is organized based on 


 
pieces priorities.


 
Storage Locations and Conditions:


 
Proper storage conditions are ensured for dedicated 


 
goods (temperature, humidity).


 
Inventory Facilities:


 
Use of high density racking with integrated pick tunnel, 


 
etc.


 








 

 
 
 



TABLE 39


 


Sea Operations


 




 




 
Description:
The capability covers all transportation


 
 
activities specific to sea cargo


 
 
operations (excluding pick-up and delivery).


 
Basic Criteria:
Reserved.


 
Competitive
Reserved.


 
Criteria:
 


 
Market Leading
Reserved.


 
Criteria:


 
 








 

 
 



TABLE 40


 


Line Haul


 




 




Description:
The capability covers shipping activities specific to road 


 
transportation between terminals or hubs (excluding 


 
pick-up and delivery).


Basic Criteria:
Shipment Location and Identification:


 
Shipments on line hauls can be identified by 


 
accompanying paperwork only.


 
Sealing:


 
Sealing is managed manually.


 
Briefing and Feedback:


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed only in case of 


 
bigger problems.


 
Line Haul Status:


 
Line haul status is communicated over phone or radio 


 
equipment.


 
Rare communication with drivers for their status in-transit.


 
Proof of delivery not required or includes manual 


 
signature.


 
Shipment Allocation and Overload Management:


 
Shipments are routed to line hauls and are loaded. 


 
Overloads are detected when they appear.


 
Manual follow-up on incidents.


Competitive
Shipment location and identification:


Criteria:
Full visibility of shipments on line hauls in the systems.


 
Sealing:


 
Sealing is managed manually with limited electronic 


 
support (e.g., seal number can be scanned into the 


 
system).


 
Briefing and Feedback:


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed based on line 


 
haul manager experience. Briefing guidelines are in place.


 
Line Haul Status:


 
Line haul movement driver communicates status and 


 
location only in case of incidents by phone or radio 


 
equipment, otherwise proper line haul operation is 


 
assumed.


 
Proof of delivery included in billings or dispatch 


 
paperwork.


 
Shipment Allocation and Overload Management:


 
Shipments are allocated to line hauls automatically 


 
to a high percentage.


 
Some manual reallocation is required.


 
Significant overloads are early detected.


 
Load alternatives must be identified manually.


Market Leading
Shipment location and identification:


Criteria:
Full visibility of shipments on line hauls down to 


 
piece level as well with line hauls executed by 


 
third parties.


 
Sealing:


 
Electronic seal management, piece-level line haul 


 
arrival notification.


 
Briefing and Feedback:


 
Operational line haul performance is determined 


 
automatically and SLA checks of subcontractors 


 
are performed as an input for debriefs.


 
Line Haul Status:


 
Communication with drivers using advanced on-


 
board technology, with 2-way messaging capability.


 
Line hauls send status and location (transponder, GPS) 


 
information to line haul managers.


 
Incidents are communicated electronically.


 
Automated on-line update on proof of delivery.


 
Shipment Allocation and Overload Management:


 
Shipments are allocated to line hauls automatically 


 
using vehicle characteristics.


 
Overloads are early detected and followed up on.


 
Tool suggests alternatives (e.g., according to shipment 


 
priorities) before loading.


 








 

 
 
 



TABLE 41


 


Rail Operations


 




 




 
Description:
The capability covers all shipping activities


 
 
specific to railway cargo transportation


 
 
(excluding pick-up and delivery)


 
Basic Criteria:
Reserved.


 
Competitive
Reserved.


 
Criteria:
 


 
Market Leading
Reserved.


 
Criteria:


 
 








 

 
 



TABLE 42


 


Air Operations


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all shipping


 
activities specific to air freight transportation


 
(excluding pick-up and delivery).


Basic Criteria:
Reserved.


Competitive
Reserved.


Criteria:
 


Market Leading
Reserved.


Criteria:


 








 

 
 



TABLE 43


 


Delivery


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all variations of road or railcar 


 
delivery/output of shipments. It covers all delivery 


 
activities starting with vehicle departure from and 


 
ending with re-arrival at the terminal/hub gate.


Basic Criteria:
Flexibility:


 
Only delivery tours are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
All work is performed based on paperwork handed 


 
over to the courier/driver during tour preparation or 


 
delivery.


 
Navigation:


 
The courier drives by experience and map.


 
Feature support:


 
Some additional delivery services are supported like 


 
proof of delivery or cash collection.


 
Proof of delivery and signature is paper work.


 
Pre-Departure Check:


 
No pre-departure check of shipments loaded is performed.


 
Status Recording:


 
Shipment status information is recorded manually or 


 
by scanning of documents.


Competitive
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Mixed pick-up and delivery tours are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
Delivery receipts are still provided manually.


 
Navigation:


 
The courier drives by experience and map.


 
Feature Support:


 
Shipments can be delivered before a certain time limit 


 
(e.g., pre-10 a.m.). Loading devices are managed 


 
manually.


 
Proof of delivery and signature still on paper work.


 
Pre-Departure Check:


 
Pre-departure check of shipments loaded is performed 


 
random-based.


 
Status Recording:


 
Load scan is done with terminal scanner on piece level. 


 
Allows to record additional status information.


Market Leading
Flexibility:


Criteria:
Pick-ups and delivery from multiple domains (freight, 


 
express) are supported.


 
Data and Document Exchange:


 
Hand-held device is used to print receipts.


 
Hand-held device allows to record proof of delivery 


 
and signature on display.


 
Receipts are printed by hand-held device.


 
Navigation:


 
The hand-held device supports as well navigation 


 
and leads the courier with optimal efficiency to 


 
the delivery locations.


 
Feature support:


 
Sophisticated product features are supported by 


 
hand-held Device: proper planning of additional 


 
lead times, delivery feasibility, cash collection, 


 
loading helps management, trailer management and 


 
courier meet pick-up/delivery and in time delivery.


 
Pre-Departure Check:


 
Pre-departure check of shipments loaded is performed 


 
random-based controlled by system.


 
Status Recording:


 
Tour feasibility is confirmed using the hand-held Device.


 
Automatic piece level checks are performed, e.g., for 


 
customers not allowing partial deliveries.


Description:
The capability covers all variations of road or railcar 


 
delivery/output of shipments. It covers all delivery 


 
activities starting with vehicle departure from and 


 
ending with re-arrival at the terminal/hub gate.


Basic Criteria:
Trip Results:


 
Extensive post tour registration process in order to 


 
record trip results.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Payment reconciliation is done manually based on 


 
paperwork.


 
Performance Management:


 
No guidelines are in place for courier performance.


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed only in case of 


 
bigger problems.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
All incidents are managed by phone or radio equipment.


 
Management Support:


 
Management is not supported by systems to minimize 


 
resources and improve customer service.


Competitive
Trip Results:


Criteria:
Only detailed recording of reason for non-delivery 


 
and proof of delivery.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Payment reconciliation is supported by system.


 
Performance Management:


 
Subcontractors and staff are debriefed based on


 
manager experience.


 
Briefing guidelines are in place.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
All incidents are managed by phone or radio.


 
Management Support:


 
Management supported with limited tools, which are 


 
not integrated with other functions' captured data.


Market Leading
Trip Results:


Criteria:
Detailed recording of reason for non-delivery available 


 
from hand-held device.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
Quick payment reconciliation by using hand-held 


 
Device information.


 
Performance Management:


 
Operational delivery performance is determined 


 
automatically and service level checks of subcontractors 


 
are performed as an input for the debrief.


 
Unplanned Activities:


 
Incidents are managed by hand-held device and phone.


 
Management Support:


 
Suite of integrated management tools available to 


 
optimize resource usage and maximize customer service.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 44


 


Delivery-Mail Delivery


 




 




Description:
The capability covers all variations of road or railcar 


 
delivery/output of shipments. It covers all delivery 


 
activities starting with vehicle departure from and 


 
ending with re-arrival at the terminal/hub gate.


 
For mail delivery, processes start with sorting and 


 
sequencing mail for final (last-mile) delivery.


Basic Criteria:
Merge, Prepare, Order Mail:


 
Non-motorized, manual equipment is used to pick-up 


 
mail containers from loading dock and transport them 


 
to delivery staging area.


 
Little to no mail containers contain mail that is a pre-sorted 


 
to the delivery final route.


 
Generic process used for delivery sequencing.


 
Little integration with Route Management and Address 


 
Management systems.


Competitive
Merge, Prepare, Order Mail:


Criteria:
Motorized equipment is used to pick-up mail containers 


 
from loading dock and transport them to delivery staging 


 
area.


 
Some mail containers contain mail that is pre-sorted to the 


 
final delivery route, provided to delivery personnel at 


 
remote pick-up locations in delivery area proximity.


 
Paper-based forms of communication are used to 


 
communicate requirements for unaddressed admail for 


 
carrier's route.


 
Specific process for manual sequencing of delivery route.


 
Some integration with Route Management and Address 


 
Management systems.


Market Leading
Merge, Prepare, Order Mail:


Criteria:
Motorized equipment is used to pick-up mail containers 


 
from loading dock and transport them to delivery staging 


 
area.


 
Mail within mail containers is pre-sorted to the delivery 


 
final route, provided to delivery personnel at remote 


 
pick-up locations in delivery area proximity.


 
Use of mobile communication devices (i.e., PDA) are used 


 
to communicate requirements for unaddressed admail for 


 
carrier's route.


 
Route sequencing is automated.


 
Route sequencing system is integrated with Route 


 
Management and Address Management systems to 


 
optimize route sequencing.


 





The following Tables 45-51 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the supplemental services platform 116.



 

 
 



TABLE 45


 


Customs Management


 




 




Description:
Management of all import/export/transit related 


 
collaboration with customs representation of the 


 
local country. Optional: Customs broker.


Basic Criteria:
Data and Document Exchange:


 
Customs is managed paper-based at least on one 


 
side, resulting in additional data capture effort. 


 
Documents are printed and forwarded via mail 


 
to customs agency.


 
Split duty and VAT:


 
Split duty and VAT, declared value manually 


 
calculated when needed.


 
Customs Clearance Procedure and Scalability:


 
Customs clearance procedures for specific goods or 


 
locations are investigated when needed.


 
Customs processes are designed only for low volumes.


 
No active management of tariffs and quota, seeking 


 
exemptions and NAFTA qualifications for new products.


 
Customs Broker:


 
Customs processes are managed in house.


Competitive
Data and Document Exchange:


Criteria:
Customs documentation is generated and submitted 


 
electronically.


 
Split Duty and VAT:


 
Split Duty and VAT, declared value are calculated 


 
system supported.


 
Repository for customs regulations available.


 
Access to harmonized customs tariffs structure is in use to 


 
forecast actual customs payments to customers to 


 
reduce risk.


 
Customs Clearance Procedure and Scalability:


 
Customs clearance procedures for specific goods or 


 
locations are in place.


 
Customs processes are scalable.


 
Use of tools to manage tariffs/quotas and accurately 


 
track country of origin for proper assessment of tariffs.


 
Customs clearance status is fully visible.


 
Use of Foreign Trade Zones and bonded facilities to 


 
clear customs nearest to point of use.


 
Customs Broker:


 
Customs management optionally handled by external 


 
customs broker.


 
Documents are forwarded manually to customs broker.


Market Leading
Data and Document Exchange:


Criteria:
High level of process and system integration with 


 
customs authorities.


 
Customs receives all manifests required for export 


 
electronically and as early as possible to ensure 


 
quick clearance.


 
Only legally required documents are forwarded 


 
paper-based.


 
Customs is automatically informed on import arrival.


 
Split Duty and VAT:


 
Duty and VAT split is automatically performed. Repository 


 
for customs regulations is managed.


 
Additional services like trade and customs advice are 


 
provided to customers.


 
Global Trade Management tool tracks tariffs, duties, 


 
and quotas, alerting when quotas are being reached.


 
Customs Clearance Procedure and Scalability:


 
Automated clearance procedures for specific goods or 


 
locations are in place and supported by systems.


 
Scalable processes.


 
A dedicated organization in large scale cases is foreseen 


 
just to deal with customs.


 
Customs clearance status is continuously monitored.


 
Customs Broker:


 
Customs management completely handled by external 


 
customs broker.


 
Customs brokerage fees/SLAs are thoroughly controlled.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 46


 


Yard and Handling Area Management


 




 




Description:
Management of the handling areas within the yards: apron, 


 
yard in front of terminals and hubs, rail car yards.


Basic Criteria:
Traffic Management:


 
Traffic not coordinated.


 
Only in-/out movement is controlled to avoid traffic 


 
jams in the yard and ensure security of goods.


 
Docking:


 
Fixed docks for specific movement relations.


 
Only incidental re-docking for delayed capacities.


 
Sorters sort always in the same way.


 
Inventory Management:


 
Inventory in the yard is not tracked at all.


 
In case inventory is missing, search activities start.


Competitive
Traffic Management:


Criteria:
Movement lanes and vehicle flows are defined.


 
Management of waiting queues.


 
Docking:


 
Docks can be rescheduled to increase efficiency of 


 
terminal.


 
No loading/unloading time slots defined and managed.


 
Docks are freed when un-/loading is finished and then 


 
used by next capacity.


 
Inventory Management:


 
Inventory in the yard is regularly tracked and followed 


 
up on, some use of tracking devices.


Market Leading
Traffic Management:


Criteria:
Traffic control (e.g., traffic lights) and planned 


 
slotting on the yard.


 
Waiting queues are taking into account for delay 


 
determination of shipments.


 
Task generation and assignment optimization, rules 


 
engine that automates business functions and an 


 
alerting mechanism to flag critical yard activities.


 
Docking:


 
Dynamic docking plan with assigned time slots for 


 
loading/unloading.


 
Sorters in Handling configured accordingly.


 
Incentives for movement operators to keep the time 


 
slot.


 
Management of delays for optimal terminal utilization.


 
Inventory Management:


 
Inventory in the yard is continuously tracked and 


 
followed up on.


 
RFID or radio senders/transponders used for real 


 
time tracking of loading devices and trailers.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 47


 


Track and Trace


 




 




Description:
This capability area involves recording and tracing 


 
information, tracking goods, mail, containers, 


 
vehicles, etc., through the network. Key information 


 
is stored throughout the network and aggregated 


 
to the appropriate level depending on the end user.


Basic Criteria:
Status Recording:


 
Shipment status information is recorded manually or 


 
by scanning documents.


 
Simple description of the event; description is not 


 
self-explanatory (e.g., location/airport not provided 


 
for events outside country).


 
Check Points:


 
Only basic check points are available.


 
Organizational Range:


 
Track and Trace is available only nationally and only 


 
on shipment Id level.


 
Little or no visibility to international in-transit shipments. 


 
Phone calls to carriers required for status.


 
Track and Trace Availability:


 
Track and Trace information is available for customers 


 
only through customer service interaction on customer 


 
request.


Competitive
Status Recording:


Criteria:
Scanning information is recorded in addition to the 


 
manual status information.


 
Load scan is done with terminal scanner on piece level. 


 
Allows to record additional status information.


 
Better look, more descriptive event information 


 
are provided to (internally and to partners/customers).


 
Check Points:


 
Advanced check point information can be provided.


 
Visibility is available throughout the whole 


 
transportation processes, including departure, 


 
in transit, and destination.


 
Organizational Range:


 
Track and trace harmonized regionally with partners.


 
In-transit info is pooled into one tracking system, hosted 


 
either internally or by one of the broker/carriers.


 
Track and Trace Availability:


 
Customers can look-up shipment status on the internet 


 
on shipment level.


 
Customer may use Pro-Active Monitoring feature.


Market Leading
Status Recording:


Criteria:
Manual or automated (RFID) scanning are recorded 


 
additionally to manual status information.


 
Real time information is available through couriers 


 
using hand-held Devices.


 
Check Points:


 
Selection of checkpoints can be tailored to freight types.


 
Full Visibility is available throughout the whole 


 
transportation processes, including departure, in 


 
transit, and destination.


 
Organizational Range:


 
Track and Trace harmonized over global supply chain.


 
Single global tracking system hosts up-to-date info for 


 
all in-transit, domestic and international shipments.


 
SC customers have controlled access to the system.


 
Track and Trace Availability:


 
Track and Trace information is available on external 


 
order number on the internet on piece level, real time.


 
Pro-Active Monitoring feature available with ERP


 
integration. Proactive event management alerts are 


 
triggered by pending exceptions.


 
Current status and history of all the tracking events 


 
are available.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 48


 


Transport Management


 




 




Description:
The capability describes the management of complex 


 
transportation chains (e.g., inter modal) and control 


 
over documents flows. Service provider gets a service 


 
fee for doing coordination and administrative tasks 


 
on behalf of the customer. This service can be 


 
performed by any transportation provider, not only 


 
by classic 3/4PLs.


Basic Criteria:
Carrier/Partner Portfolio:


 
 Carrier/partner portfolio is historically grown and 


 
 not consistently managed.


 
 See Supplier Management capability for further 


 
 details.


 
Document Management:


 
 Invoice consolidation is not possible; it is mainly a 


 
 paper-based manual process.


 
 Document exchange with customers or partners is a 


 
 manual process.


 
 For document archiving see Information/Data 


 
 Management capability.


 
Financial Management:


 
 Payments and transactions managed manually.


Competitive
Carrier/Partner Portfolio:


Criteria:
 Carrier/partner portfolio is regularly categorized and 


 
 evaluated based on SWOT analysis.


 
 Network plans and schedules are fully aligned with 


 
 the external partners.


 
 See Supplier Management capability for further 


 
 details.


 
Document Management:


 
 Basic document management system capabilities are 


 
 in place.


 
 For document archiving see Information/Data 


 
 Management capability.


 
Financial Management:


 
 The most common transactions can be managed 


 
 electronically with the bigger partners.


Market Leading 
Carrier/Partner Portfolio:


Criteria:
 Carrier/partner portfolio continuously categorized 


 
 and evaluated based on SWOT analysis or strategic 


 
 sourcing.


 
 Carriers and partners are individually informed 


 
 about forecast of volumes.


 
 See Supplier Management Element for further 


 
 details.


 
Document Management:


 
 Advanced document management capabilities. 


 
 Electronic consolidation and forwarding of


 
 suppliers invoices to customers.


 
 For document archive see Data Management


 
 capability.


 
Financial Management:


 
 Full electronic payment and transaction 


 
 management (e.g., transactions according to Bill 


 
 of Lading).


 








 

 
 



TABLE 49


 


Payment Handling


 




 




Description:
This capability involves various payment collection 


 
options (EXW, DDU/DDP, cash-on-delivery, 


 
third-party payment collection) for shipments, 


 
excluding mail postage counter payment collection.


Basic Criteria:
Payment Types:


 
 Cash and cheque against service provider are valid 


 
 payment options.


 
Supported Payment Features:


 
 Payment collection for freight pre-paid (DDP/DDU), 


 
 collect (EXW) and COD for the goods is possible.


 
Documentation:


 
 The process is completely paper-based. Payments 


 
 are documented on pick-up delivery receipts.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
 Reconciliation of payments is done against receipts.


 
Processes and Systems Support:


 
 Payments and transactions managed manually.


 
 Restrictions in rate calculation of basic or additional 


 
 services. Services are rated stand-alone having no 


 
 dependencies with other services.


 
 For international shipments manual split of duty and 


 
 VAT for freight is performed.


Competitive
Payment Types:


Criteria:
 Cash, cheque, and cheque against customer are valid 


 
 payment options.


 
 Redirection to account payment is possible.


 
Supported Payment Features:


 
 Additionally to payment collection for freight pre-paid 


 
 (DDU/DDP), collect (EXW) and COD for the goods 


 
 payments can be collected as well on behalf of any 


 
 third party (EXW) (e.g., partner).


 
Documentation:


 
 Payment confirmation can be printed using hand-held 


 
 Device.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
 Payment discrepancies are balanced using the software. 


 
 Outstanding payments can be charged to pick-up and 


 
 delivery service provider/courier.


 
Processes and Systems Support:


 
 The most common transactions can be managed 


 
 electronically.


 
 Outsourced invoice printing and distribution has been 


 
 considered.


 
 Customization of invoicing facilities is provided for 


 
 key customer.


 
 No restrictions in rate calculation of basic or 


 
 additional services.


 
 Invoicing is fully flexible to any pricing model.


 
 For international shipments automated split of duty 


 
 and VAT for freight is performed.


Market Leading
Payment Types:


Criteria:
 Cash, cheque, cheque against customer and credit 


 
 cards are supported for payment. Credit card checks 


 
 can be performed wireless.


 
 Automatic account validation and charge of payments 


 
 against account is possible via hand-held Device.


 
Supported Payment Features:


 
 Same as “competitive”.


 
Documentation:


 
 Payment process during pick-up and delivery is 


 
 completely done using hand-held Devices. 


 
 Payment confirmation can be printed using a hand-


 
 held Device.


 
Payment Reconciliation:


 
 Payment discrepancies are balanced using the 


 
 software.


 
 Follow-up mechanisms are in place.


 
 Outstanding payments can be charged to pick-up and 


 
 delivery service provider/courier.


 
 Payment reconciliation is done based on hand-held 


 
 device information downloaded.


 
Processes and Systems Support:


 
 Full electronic payment and transaction management 


 
 (e.g., transactions according to Bill of Lading).


 
 Complex rating rules are supported like multi-


 
 dimensional tariffs, time bands and event


 
 segmentation.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 50


 


Special Requirements Management


 




 




Description:
Management of freight and mail, which require 


 
special treatment (e.g., temperature control, oversize, 


 
dangerous).


Basic Criteria:
Operational Excellence:


 
 Goods with special requirements only transported 


 
 occasionally.


 
 Manual, effort-intensive and inefficient procedures.


 
Support Paperwork:


 
 Support paperwork managed manually.


 
Special Vehicle and Driver Requirements:


 
 Special vehicle and driver requirements are checked 


 
 manually.


Competitive
Operational Excellence:


Criteria:
 Easy to understand guidelines for employees to fulfill 


 
 requirements of goods with special requirements.


 
 Staff trained on the different kinds of goods with


 
 special requirements and how to handle them 


 
 efficiently and correctly.


 
 Cleaning and waste management detailed procedures 


 
 defined and controlled.


 
Support Paperwork:


 
 Support paperwork managed manually. Quality 


 
 checklists in place.


 
 Legal requirements are managed in a look-up 


 
 repository.


 
Special Vehicle and Driver Requirements:


 
 Special vehicle and driver requirements are checked 


 
 automatically.


 
 Temperature control in place when needed.


 
 Dangerous goods check performed manually to avoid 


 
 illegal combination of goods.


Market Leading
Operational Excellence:


Criteria:
 All legal and transportation requirements and 


 
 constraints are automatically checked by the system.


 
 Warnings are generated to ensure proper handling of 


 
 goods by staff.


 
 Scalability of processes ensured, especial when large 


 
 volumes or quantities have to be transported.


 
Support Paperwork:


 
 System requires check of support paperwork at 


 
 dedicated checkpoints.


 
Special Vehicle and Driver Requirements:


 
 Dangerous goods check performed automatically to 


 
 avoid illegal combination of goods.


 
 Automatic detection of hazardous goods/shipments to 


 
 specified addresses (e.g., parliament), as part of 


 
 sorting capability.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 51


 


Exceptions Management


 




 




Description:
This capability includes the generic activities that are 


 
required to manage exceptions. Exceptions to the 


 
usual way of operations can range from misrouted 


 
shipments to facility outages due to critical incidents 


 
or disasters and need to be dealt with accordingly. 


 
A common understanding is required of how events 


 
will be captured and handled.


Basic Criteria:
Process Definition:


 
 Exceptions (rejected, damaged, etc.) are managed 


 
 when they appear.


 
 Exceptions handling procedures are documented and 


 
 staff trained.


 
Exception Identification:


 
 Customer service must investigate with operations 


 
 if there is an exception and which type in case of a 


 
 customer complaint.


 
 See capability Customer Interaction (Claims and 


 
 Complaints).


 
Shipment Modification:


 
 No control over shipment modifications. Only done 


 
 by staff when needed.


Competitive
Process Definition:


Criteria:
 Exceptions process definitions are managed and 


 
 documentation regularly updated (best practices) and 


 
 communicated.


 
Exception Identification:


 
 Exceptions can be seen by customer service within 


 
 shipment record.


 
 Statistics about exception occurrences and analysis 


 
 of root causes are regularly performed.


 
Shipment Modification:


 
 Shipment modification rules are documented and 


 
 known but not checked by system.


 
 Only a knowledgeable responsible can perform 


 
 shipment modification.


Market Leading
Process Definition:


Criteria:
 Exception handling strategy is developed and in place.


 
 Exception process definitions are continuously 


 
 improved, documented and trained.


 
 System support for exception management 


 
 continuously evaluated for extensions.


 
Exception Identification:


 
 Exceptions are automatically monitored and 


 
 related processes automatically initiated.


 
 Detailed processes are defined and implemented for 


 
 all generic processes like rejected, misrouted, 


 
 damaged, incomplete shipments.


 
Shipment Modification:


 
 Shipment modification rules are automatically 


 
 checked by the system.


 





The following Tables 52-57 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the retail operations platform 118.



 

 
 



TABLE 52


 


Store Operations


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all activities related 


 
to running the brick-and-mortar store from an 


 
administrative perspective.


Basic Criteria:
Staff Management:


 
 No systemized performance evaluation of store 


 
 operating personnel.


 
Staff Training:


 
 Training of store personnel done on an as needed 


 
 basis per employee.


 
 Training performed by the local staff.


 
 Select staff members are trained to perform special 


 
 services, e.g., handle passport requests.


 
Cash Management:


 
 Nightly procedures for balancing the store's cash 


 
 balance are created by each store.


Competitive
Staff Management:


Criteria:
 Performance of store operating personnel is measured 


 
 in terms of services provided in total and varies 


 
 considerably between individuals.


 
Staff Training:


 
 Training of store personnel done on a regional or 


 
 organization level basis. All new personnel attend 


 
 the same training session.


 
 All staff members are trained to perform the entire 


 
 range of services offered at the store.


 
Cash Management:


 
 Nightly procedures for balancing the store's cash 


 
 balance are created centrally.


Market Leading 
Staff Management:


Criteria:
 Pro-active store operating personnel assessment by 


 
 key performance indicator using performance 


 
 analysis software.


 
Staff Training:


 
 POS and other store data is taken into account when 


 
 designing the content for the store staff training 


 
 program. Updates to the ongoing training curriculum 


 
 are based on the data collected at stores.


 
Cash Management:


 
 Cash Management procedures are audited by a 


 
 central team at each store.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 53


 


Category Planning and Management


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all activities related to 


 
planning and managing the assortment of goods and 


 
services offered through the post's retail activities, 


 
including their assignment to and within stores.


Basic Criteria:
Product Trend Tracking:


 
 Product attributes not tracked/maintained.


 
Category Planning Integration:


 
 Lack of integration between category planning and 


 
 other function, e.g., customer insight, pricing, 


 
 forecasting.


 
Item Management:


 
 Items are maintained in system manually, often 


 
 duplicate keying, paper based and redundant set 


 
 up across channels.


 
Historical Sales Analysis:


 
 Limited historical measures (e.g., sales, margin) 


 
 used to analyze historic performance of the 


 
 assortment.


 
Category Development:


 
 Assortment plans developed by buyers and 


 
 communicated around the business at key stages .


 
Store Format:


 
 Generic store format not customized to local market. 


 
 One assortment for the entire chain.


Competitive
Product Trend Tracking:


Criteria:
 Track key attribute trends to make broad decisions.


 
Category Planning Integration:


 
 Manual integration between category planning and 


 
 other functions.


 
Item Management:


 
 Centralized item maintain function within the 


 
 organization.


 
Historical Sales Analysis:


 
 Detailed analysis and measures available when 


 
 choosing assortment items.


 
Category Development:


 
 Assortment plans developed primarily by buyers and 


 
 merchandisers but with a clearly defined RACI to 


 
 describe input required from finance, stores, 


 
 marketing, supply chain and logistics.


 
Store Format:


 
 Store offerings are standardized on regional basis. 


 
 Basic store groups used such as geography, climate.


 
 Some stores offer tailored products based on 


 
 customer's special requirements.


Market Leading
Product Trend Tracking:


Criteria:
 Multiple views to attribute mix available and used 


 
 extensively in planning the assortment.


 
 Category Planning Integration:


 
 Seamless integration between category planning and 


 
 other functions.


 
 Data synchronization with suppliers.


 
Item Management:


 
 Centralized management of item data across 


 
 channels/lines of business.


 
 Items are maintained electronically with global 


 
 standards.


 
Historical Sales Analysis:


 
 Use of leading measures in choosing the assortment, 


 
 e.g., “True” SKU and item level profitability, trickle 


 
 sales, EVA.


 
Category Development:


 
 Assortment plans created collaboratively between all 


 
 functions within the business and suppliers.


 
 Key input provided from stores and space planning.


 
Store Format:


 
 Individual store offers aligned with needs of specific


 
 customer base.


 
 Assortments created using store groupings that are 


 
 based on store-level demand patterns.


 
 Differentiated and branded services and convenience 


 
 products.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 54


 


Price and Revenue Management


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all activities related to the 


 
management of retail prices and revenue for goods and 


 
services, including the required planning aspects as well 


 
as handling slow sellers, clearance and markdowns.


Basic Criteria:
Pricing Methodology:


 
 Retail price is a simple mark-up on cost price.


 
 Simple price ladder distribution - entry price, mid 


 
 price, premium price.


 
Price Markdowns:


 
 Simple tactical promotions implemented with little 


 
 program management.


 
 Generic price markdown strategies that are generally 


 
 aggressive e.g. 50%+ off.


 
Use of Sales History during Contracting:


 
 Seldom sales and marketing information feedback into 


 
 contracting and negotiation, new/extension of contract 


 
 varies significantly.


Competitive
Pricing Methodology:


Criteria:
 Understanding of price sensitive items.


 
 Price sensitivity models, price halo item selection, 


 
 category roles.


 
Price Markdowns:


 
 Markdown strategies implemented to optimize sales and


 
 actual andforecast end of season inventory positions.


 
 Clearly defined exit strategies with options based on 


 
 product type, priority and trading conditions.


 
Use of Sales History during Contracting:


 
 Clearance decisions feedback into contracting and 


 
 negotiations to build flexibility for high risk lines.


Market Leading 
Pricing Methodology:


Criteria:
 Understand customer segment price sensitivity.


 
 Statistical understanding of price elasticity.


 
 Sku store price optimization based on elasticity, 


 
 distance to competitors, price strategy, etc.


 
Price Markdowns:


 
 High inventory lines managed by exception early 


 
 on in season through what-if modeling.


 
 Tailored clearance and markdown strategies 


 
 implemented to optimize margin, sales and inventory 


 
 levels based on price elasticity and accurate 


 
 forecasts of sales and stock.


 
 Use of Sales History during Contracting:


 
 Flexibility in contract cancellations to reduce stock 


 
 into business and clearance requirements.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 55


 


Store Inventory Management


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all activities related to the 


 
management of inventory, including the regular tracking 


 
and updating of movements, inventory performance and 


 
valuation as well as analysis and periodic inventory 


 
taking.


Basic Criteria:
Inventory Tracking Method:


 
 ‘Big bang’ manual physical stocktakes occur at certain 


 
 points in the calendar (quarterly, half yearly).


 
 Stocktakes based on value as opposed to units.


 
 Limited shrinkage controls, e.g., Tagging.


 
 Forecasting, planning and scheduling activities driven 


 
 by convenient calendar cycles.


 
Inventory Visibility:


 
 No SKU level inventory visibility or some stock 


 
 visibility at store level only; supply is not pooled


 
 across locations.


 
 Inventory Performance Management:


 
 Evaluation of store inventory done manually.


 
 No metrics for evaluation of store inventory.


Competitive
Inventory Tracking Method:


Criteria:
 Manual physical stocktakes still used.


 
 Low inventory cycle count accuracy.


 
 Integrated inventory planning systems.


 
 Some perpetual inventory counts to provide SKU 


 
 visibility.


 
 Forecasting, planning and scheduling time buckets 


 
 determined by business process cycles (e.g., 


 
 manufacturing).


 
Inventory Visibility:


 
 Inventory visibility on regional basis. Organization is 


 
 in cross-communications over shared SKUs.


 
Inventory Performance Management:


 
 Common KPIs are used for measure the performance 


 
 for all the store inventory with limited flexibility.


Market Leading
Inventory Tracking Method:


Criteria:
 Ability to utilize capital budget constraints to determine 


 
 optimal inventory levels and resulting customer 


 
 service levels.


 
 Have separate inventory planning processes for: fast 


 
 turning central stock; contracted inventory in field; 


 
 new product intro inventory; end of life.


 
 Collecting POS demand data at the SKU level and 


 
 aggregating it to develop safety stocks and inventory 


 
 requirements.


 
 Extensive use of inventory decisions models - updated 


 
 regularly.


 
Inventory Visibility:


 
 Visibility of inventory across all geographies to be 


 
 able to minimize safety stock; advance deployment 


 
 of parts in advance of introduction of new products.


 
 Supply is pooled and committed based on demand 


 
 patterns or captured business rules, and termed 


 
 Available to Promise in an Advanced Planning 


 
 System.


 
Inventory Performance Management:


 
 Advanced system is used to evaluate inventory 


 
 performance according to historical data collected 


 
 with integration of customer and vendor.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 56


 


Replenishment


 




 




Description:
This capability area includes all activities related to the 


 
replenishment of a store with goods and service related 


 
material, link brochures, forms, etc. It includes demand 


 
determination activities, order requisition to balance the 


 
demand as well as the goods receipt. It also covers any 


 
inter-store transfers and reservations.


Basic Criteria:
Replenishment Method:


 
 Basic sales based replenishment methods. Replenishment 


 
 parameters managed at lower levels of the hierarchy 


 
 (e.g., SKU).


 
 No replenishment parameter tuning; replenishment 


 
 parameters are difficult to update.


 
Replenishment Plan Modifications:


 
 Manual intervention to change replenishment orders 


 
 (e.g. exceeding OTB, change forecasts, etc.).


 
Automated Replenishment Calculations:


 
 Automated sales based replenishment system based on 


 
 simple calculations, e.g., min/max, RWIS, etc.


 
Stock Allocation:


 
 Stock allocation process independent of store 


 
 replenishment processes and allocated in a single lump.


Competitive
Replenishment Method:


Criteria:
 Replenishment accountability primarily within dedicated 


 
 Supply Chain function but with a clearly defined RACI 


 
 to describe input required from stores, marketing, 


 
 B&M and logistics.


 
Replenishment Plan Modifications:


 
 Optimize replenishment settings by identifying hot 


 
 sellers early in the season and putting them on back


 
 order early. 


 
 Automated ordering based on historical sales, forecasted 


 
 demand, presentation levels and dynamic safety stock. 


 
 Exception reporting on out-of-stocks, shortages and 


 
 excess stock.


 
Automated Replenishment Calculations:


 
 Replenishment engine driven by accurate forecasting 


 
 system within tailored replenishment algorithms. 


 
 Replenishment integrated with stock management 


 
 systems to automate ordering/allocations.


 
Stock Allocation:


 
 Allocations integrated with replenishment process.


 
 Variable allocations based on store size/range and on 


 
 hand quantities and incorporate recent trading history.


Market Leading
Replenishment Method:


Criteria:
 Inventory planners proactively manage the process, 


 
 tuning replenishment parameters through monitoring 


 
 key metrics and trends, such as forecast performance, 


 
 in-stock %, etc.


 
Replenishment Plan Modifications:


 
 Continuous replenishment using real-time sales and 


 
 stock information.


 
 Replenishment driven by single, high accuracy forecast. 


 
 Wide range of replenishment cycles, tailored to fit


 
 product characteristics, category role, supply chain


 
 requirements. Process integrated with OTB and WSSI.


 
Automated Replenishment Calculations:


 
 An advanced replenishment system will determine 


 
 store/SKU level inventory requirements utilizing 


 
 multiple forecasting and replenishment methodologies 


 
 and order at the store/SKU level. Automated alerting


 
 systems with exception management.


 
Stock Allocation:


 
 Allocation decision based on visibility of stock in the 


 
 pipeline.


 
 Final store allocations to be delayed until latest possible 


 
 moment prior to DC arrival to leverage most recent 


 
 information.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 57


 


Licensing Management


 




 




Description:
This capability area covers the management of postal 


 
licenses provided to third parties that offer services 


 
on behalf of the post. After the required partner selection 


 
is made this area includes the operational support, 


 
training and integration of a third party as well as 


 
regular performance audits and the settlement of 


 
outstanding fees and revenues.


Basic Criteria:
Training Standards:


 
 Training content development and execution is done 


 
 by local teams.


 
 Training not standardized or prioritized.


 
LPO Support:


 
 Localized support teams created for each LPO. No 


 
 standard support channel for all LPOs.


 
Performance Audits:


 
 Ad hoc performance audits of LPOs. No standard 


 
 checklist used in each audit. Audit is performed at 


 
 the discretion of each employee.


Competitive
Training Standards:


Criteria:
 Training content for LPOs is developed centrally 


 
 into Computer Based Trainings and store manuals. 


 
 Training performed on an ad hoc basis as requested 


 
 by LPOs by local teams.


 
 Training prioritized and rigorously implemented.


 
LPO Support:


 
 A dedicated central team handles all LPO support 


 
 requests.


 
Performance Audits:


 
 Completed with a standard checklist of items for 


 
 every LPO.


Market Leading
Training Standards:


Criteria:
 One training program instituted. Attendance required 


 
 for all LPOs.


 
 Centralized team dedicated to developing training 


 
 content and training execution.


 
 Continuous training programs with zero tolerance


 
 conformance.


 
Staff Skillset:


 
 Store staff multi-skilled, tailored by format.


 
LPO Support:


 
 Multiple channels of support offered to LPOs, 


 
 including a call center and web/mobile/email 


 
 channels.


 
Performance Audits:


 
 Audits completed by a central team and the data is 


 
 used to compare and rate LPO performance. 


 
 Performance gaps are assessed and


 
 communicated to LPOs. Used as input to the 


 
 LPO training development.


 





The following Tables 58-68 provide an explanation of the capabilities and corresponding key assessment areas and performance capability criteria for each capability within the enterprise platform 120.



 

 
 



TABLE 58


 


Corporate Strategy


 




 




Description:
Please note that the majority of these capabilities are 


 
being developed by the respective Business Consulting 


 
Service Lines. Please refer to the Strategy SL asset for 


 
details on this capability.


Basic Criteria:
Strategic Planning:


 
 No strategic planning, no collaborative planning; little 


 
 or no continuous improvement focus.


 
 Strategic Supply Chain planning takes place in response 


 
 to major discontinuities or marketplace events.


 
 Business planning is limited to annual budgeting and 


 
 forecasting.


 
 Return on capital employed is used as a key driver of 


 
 business decisions.


Competitive
Strategic Planning:


Criteria:
 Strategic plan specified, infrequently implemented. 


 
 Strategic plan and alliance strategy in place.


 
 Strategic supply chain planning takes place periodically.


 
 Business planning is structured process including a 


 
 detailed audit of the previous year's initiatives and the 


 
 progress made on achieving them.


 
 The firm makes decisions (e.g., investment decisions) 


 
 based on cash flow and payback criteria.


Market Leading
Strategic Planning:


Criteria:
 1-3-5 year strategy document; joint continuous 


 
 improvement based on solid data. Scenario response


 
 based on real-time status feeds.


 
 Regular strategic review process keeps proactive 


 
 supply chain strategy updated.


 
 The firm uses shareholder value analysis to make 


 
 business decisions.


 
 Business planning is a regular and scheduled 


 
 process. It requires dedication from the entire team.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 59


 


Finance and Accounting


 




 




Description:
This capability relates to finance and accounting 


 
operations, enterprise performance management, 


 
capital stewardship and risk management.


Basic Criteria:
Organization has limited processes for F&A, 


 
business units, or geographies.


 
Multiple ERP and legacy systems.


 
Spreadsheets and/or various stand alone applications 


 
dominate planning, forecasting, data analysis, 


 
and reporting activities.


 
No web enablement of any F&A applications.


 
Department are owners of the processes. Errors 


 
corrected at the back-end Much time spent chasing 


 
small $ items.


 
Nearly all managers with cost center or profit and loss 


 
responsibility have dedicated finance support. 


 
No limit on ability to consume finance time.


 
Finance and Accounting provides basic planning and 


 
forecasting.


 
Manages cost structures not consistently and not 


 
systematically.


 
Managed costs are gathered and consolidated but not 


 
optimized.


 
Applicable laws, regulations, standards are controlled 


 
by random tests.


 
Only basic internal policies and rules are available not 


 
systematically controlled.


Competitive
Organization has define processes for F&A, is limited 


Criteria:
to certain business units or geographies, has service 


 
centers in moderate to high cost locations.


 
Single ERP system, with exceptions, some legacy 


 
systems not yet decommissioned. Best of breed extensions 


 
deployed inconsistently, spreadsheets still tool of choice. 


 
Web connections to other functions automated work


 
flow.


 
Process owners entirely within Finance. Errors 


 
corrected at the back-end. Limited use of materiality 


 
limits.


 
GMs with profit and loss responsibility have dedicated 


 
finance support, others share finance resources. 


 
Limited self service capabilities in place.


 
Finance and Accounting provides basic planning and 


 
forecasting.


 
Cost structures are managed consistently and 


 
systematically to a medium hierarchy level. .


 
Some unsystematic optimization of costs is performed.


 
Applicable laws, regulations, standards are consecutively 


 
checked and the organization is probed against them. 


 
Internal policies and rules are defined and communicated 


 
on a detailed level but internal controls not yet fully 


 
implemented.


Market Leading
All appropriate transaction processing, closing, and 


Criteria:
reporting. Nearly all redundant activities and organizations 


 
are eliminated. Service centers even in low cost locations. 


 
Provides self service capabilities wherever possible.


 
Single ERP system used worldwide; no legacy system.


 
Best of breed extensions used with spreadsheets as 


 
“supplements.


 
Web connections to customers, suppliers, and other 


 
functions; automated work flow.


 
Process owners “Upstream” activities designed with 


 
“downstream” processing in mind.


 
Minimum exceptions.


 
GMs with material profit and loss responsibility 


 
have dedicated finance support - others share 


 
finance resources.


 
Recurring, standard reporting delivered via self serve 


 
portal. Focuses on business analytics and “what if”' 


 
scenario planning and forecasting rather than data 


 
gathering and consolidation.


 
Manages cost structures down consistently to achieve 


 
and sustain operating cost leadership. Optimizes 


 
managed costs such as working capital, effective tax 


 
rates, benefits costs, etc., in addition to operating 


 
cost structures.


 
Ensures effective compliance with applicable laws, 


 
regulations, standards, internal policies and rules 


 
(including budgets) in all financial transactions and 


 
reporting.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 60


 


Human Resources


 




 




Description:
This capability relates to the management of the company's 


 
human resources and covers all related non-operational 


 
activities from sourcing to enabling to retiring resources.


Basic 
Following extract non exhaustive for demo and reference 


Criteria:
only - please consult the HP SL for full details.


 
Ability to Change:


 
Change is Leadership-driven.


 
Change is based on the focus, tenacity and leadership 


 
of an individual.


 
A top-down approach is used to drive change efforts.


 
Leaders generally rely on several key techniques to push 


 
change, such as: invoking an outside crisis; transforming 


 
the enterprise to a new operating model; articulating a 


 
common-sense business case for change; and, frequent 


 
communication with all levels of the organization.


 
Individuals are generally resistant to change, and 


 
lack the skills and experience to adapt effectively.


 
Change efforts take a long time to complete and


 
often fail to produce expected results.


Competitive
Following extract non exhaustive for demo and 


Criteria:
reference only - please consult the HP SL for full details.


 
Ability to Change:


 
Change is process driven, and the responsibility for 


 
change no longer rests solely with leadership.


 
Systems within the organization support, rather than 


 
impede, change.


 
The organization typically has mechanisms in place 


 
in the areas of performance measures, employee 


 
competencies, decision-making, organizational structure, 


 
and communication that allow employees to not only 


 
implement change, but drive it in a way that is consistent 


 
with the organization's reward system and 


 
performance measures.


 
Most individuals neither support nor resist change.


 
Some, but not all individuals are skilled in managing


 
change.


 
Change efforts are generally lengthy and costly.


Market 
Following extract non exhaustive for demo and 


Leading
reference only - please consult the HP SL for full details.


Criteria:
Ability to Change:


 
The organization has developed an organic 


 
capacity to change 


 
Change is so ingrained into day-to-day behavior 


 
that it is in a sense invisible.


 
This capability and behavior defines the culture 


 
of the organization.


 
Change is often driven from the bottom of the 


 
organization.


 
Employees do not see it as a separate effort, 


 
but as part of their jobs, and as an opportunity 


 
rather than a threat.


 
The organization embraces learning, relies on 


 
self-defined, team-based performance measures, 


 
has high levels of trust between employees and 


 
management, and focus on developing change 


 
competencies in employees.


 
Change typically happens quickly and 


 
with minor disruptions to the organization.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 61


 


Procurement


 




 




Description:
This capability relates to the provisioning of 


 
equipment and material for operational activities.


Basic Criteria:
Requisitions:


 
Paper- or phone-based requisitions placed to 


 
purchasing or directly to vendor.


 
Procurement and AP spend large percentage of 


 
time processing low-dollar transactions.


 
No formal/consistent approval process in place.


 
Purchase Goods and Services:


 
Procurement professionals spend large 


 
percentage of time sourcing low-dollar 


 
requisitions into purchase orders.


 
No supplier rationalization program in place.


 
Each site has autonomy to source materials and 


 
services from vendor of choice.


 
Invoice Processing:


 
Accounts payable processes are disbursed 


 
throughout the organization.


 
Receipt required for the majority of purchases; 


 
match invoice to purchase order and other 


 
supporting documentation.


 
Copies of each invoice is made and stored 


 
in multiple files in Purchasing, and Accounts 


 
Payable.


 
Pay Suppliers:


 
Automation of payments is unavailable.


 
Checks are manually produced in some instances.


 
Payment is made to a supplier even though 


 
the supplier may owe the buyer.


 
Multiple invoices from one vendor result in 


 
multiple checks being issued.


 
Check runs are not optimized.


Competitive
Requisitions:


Criteria:
Use of Procurement cards to eliminate the 


 
transactions associated with high-volume, 


 
low dollar purchases (POs/Invoices).


 
Web-based requisitioning tools made 


 
available to select employees.


 
Approval process in place but not rigidly 


 
followed; requisitioners have no consistent 


 
access to status of approval.


 
Purchase Goods and Services:


 
Strategic sourcing has reduced suppliers 


 
but results are not communicated to users; 


 
“non-approved” suppliers still utilized; 


 
process to rationalize suppliers is inconsistent.


 
Requisitioner/BU involved in sourcing decision.


 
POs transmitted via auto-fax.


 
Invoice Processing:


 
Invoices received via EDI or XML, paper


 
invoices scanned for documentation and 


 
approval routing purposes.


 
Invoices not referencing a PO are electronically 


 
routed for approval; invoices that have been matched 


 
do not require an additional approval.


 
Vendors provide weekly/monthly summary invoices.


 
Pay Suppliers:


 
Consolidate payments to same supplier from 


 
invoices across the organization.


 
Use automatic payment for standard, recurring items.


 
Electronic check signing/approval can occur remotely.


Market 
Requisitions:


Leading
Utilize eProcurement applications with preferred 


Criteria:
supplier/preferred item catalogs; requisition approval 


 
steps are automated and minimized; no approval


 
necessary for expense items below a certain dollar 


 
amount;


 
Requisitioners have real time access to 


 
requisition approval status and PO status.


 
Purchase Goods and Services:


 
Routine purchases bypass procurement 


 
through the use of p-cards, eP, and reorder systems; 


 
No approval required on PO if obtained on requisition; 


 
EDI/XML PO sent to supplier via eMarketplace 


 
or private exchange.


 
Preferred suppliers are strategically 


 
selected “partners” and communicated to organization.


 
Invoice Processing:


 
View purchasing and payables as one process 


 
versus two distinct organizations.


 
Invoiceless processing through use of ERS 


 
(evaluated receipts settlement, where payment is 


 
made after matching receipt to purchase order); 


 
invoices received and processed by centralized 


 
shared services center or outsourced to third party; 


 
minimize levels of reporting hierarchy in SSC.


 
Pay Suppliers:


 
Entire disbursements process is outsourced to third party; 


 
payments made via EDI/EFT; 


 
allow suppliers access to view status of payments.


 
Link AR and AP systems to prevent payments 


 
being made to suppliers who are also customers 


 
with outstanding receivables.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 62


 


Information Technology


 




 




Description:
This capability covers the management of 


 
Information Technology, and the related 


 
processes to create, run and maintain the IT 


 
architecture, applications and infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
IT Strategy:


 
Lack of supply chain IT strategy, or supply chain IT 


 
strategy is not aligned with an enterprise-wide IT strategy.


 
Limited buy-in to new technology.


 
New technology is implemented in fragmented 


 
way that does not cover entire operations area.


Competitive
IT Strategy:


Criteria:
IT strategy defined at specific function level only, 


 
but may not be articulated across the business.


 
Developing support for changes in technology. 


 
Use of PC tools such as spreadsheets and basic database.


Market Leading
IT Strategy:


Criteria:
Enterprise-wide IT strategy clearly defined and understood; 


 
supports and enables supply chain technology initiatives.


 
Continuously seek out knowledge on available technology 


 
and practical application to business.


 
High degree of buy-in leading to successful 


 
implementation.


 
Full integrated transactional systems with decision support 


 
tools that provide quick resolution to complex issues across


 
businesses. Explores and utilizes eCommerce opportunities.


 
Standard suite of end user tools rolled out.


 
Tool standards exist and are enforced.


Description:
This capability covers the management of Information 


 
Technology, and the related processes to create, run and 


 
maintain the IT architecture, applications and 


 
infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
General Architecture:


 
Internally-centric architecture.


 
All system interfaces are point-to-point, mostly batch. 


 
Most planning is monthly or weekly.


 
Many fragmented planning applications with 


 
overlapping functions/data supporting optimization


 
at the local level only.


 
Functionally-oriented applications vs. process-oriented.


 
Security cannot extend beyond the enterprise.


 
Discontinuity of business data viewed by different


 
levels of the organization.


 
Primary reporting is static printed reports from 


 
each application.


 
Data is messaged at each level of the organization 


 
over a period of time before senior management 


 
sees it. The value of this old and “improved” 


 
data is questionable.


Competitive
General Architecture:


Criteria:
Architecture extends beyond the enterprise 


 
with Point-to-Point business connectivity (i.e., EDI).


 
System interfaces includes both batch and real-time. 


 
Planning is mostly weekly or daily.


 
System integration tools (EAI) provide standard 


 
package connectors and tools for building or


 
customizing new integration.


 
Global consolidation of internal data for global 


 
decision-making (may be data warehouse). Timing 


 
age of data is usually an issue.


 
Process-oriented applications or collections of 


 
data for cross-process visibility/analysis.


 
Data for external use is sent to business partners 


 
or posted in DMZ for viewing/extraction by the 


 
business partner.


 
Single data source for all business reporting/


 
metrics with ad-hoc analysis capabilities. 


 
Standard KPI defined/reported.


Market Leading
General Architecture:


Criteria:
Global architecture and connectivity. All customers/


 
suppliers have access to relevant data real-time. 


 
Data is “trickled in” vs. periodic batch extract.


 
System interaction is controlled via a data-bus which 


 
supports both batch and real-time interaction, 


 
enhances data/process reuse, and is enables reduced 


 
on-going support effort by better isolation of 


 
system changes.


 
Global planning capabilities driven off of global 


 
instance of real-time data. Data is provided in a 


 
net-change mode to eliminate long extract/transfer 


 
processing times. Global planning is run daily or 


 
even multiple times daily (shift).


 
Data warehouse and data analytics capability 


 
replaces most of static reporting. Pre-packaged 


 
standard metrics and views enable consistent business 


 
metrics at all levels of the organization.


 
Business driver KPI's are visible to all 


 
organizational levels.


 
Management dashboards with exception-


 
based views, drill-down and notation capabilities 


 
are used to drive and improve the business management.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 63


 


Information Technology Development Architecture


 




 




Description:
This capability covers the management of


 
Information Technology, and the related processes 


 
to create, run and maintain the IT architecture, 


 
applications and infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
Development Architecture:


 
The development environment consists of PC's 


 
or one or more small or shared servers.


 
The test environment is shared with development.


 
Training is planned without a hands-on component 


 
or environment.


 
Multiple tools/technologies are used to source data


 
from other systems based on the client's current 


 
environment and tools. Most work is custom. 


 
Integration is point-to-point.


 
HW and SW version control process over 


 
development and test environment is ad-hoc.


 
Each project team member brings in their own 


 
tools and methods to the project.


 
Cross-project communication and coordination


 
is ad-hoc.


Competitive
Development Architecture:


Criteria:
A development environment setup to deliver 


 
maximum productivity of project team on 


 
design/build activities.


 
A separate test environment is setup to deliver


 
the complete scope of project testing requirements.


 
Hands-on training is delivered using the test 


 
environment.


 
Integration tools used are provided by the 


 
planning system vendor or the source system 


 
and are based on ease/speed of delivery.


 
Mix of custom and standard or configurable products. 


 
Integration is product-dependent.


 
A manual process is established to control HW 


 
and software changes to all operating environments.


 
Standard tools are identified and provided to the 


 
project team based on project needs, and budgeted 


 
in the project plan.


 
Cross-project communication and sharing is 


 
facilitated by providing a shared repository for 


 
project deliverables and documentation.


Market 
Development Architecture:


Leading
Flexible and separate development and test 


Criteria:
environments are planned, scheduled, built, partitioned 


 
and scaled to support project maximum project 


 
effectiveness with parallel work streams and a mix of 


 
prototyping/dev, unit and full volume system testing, 


 
user testing and training activities.


 
A separate training environment is setup and 


 
maintained as an on-going capability.


 
A formal data integration layer is built using EAI 


 
tools reducing overall integration complexity. A small set 


 
of effective tools used to source data from other systems 


 
based on best fit and performance requirements. Integration 


 
is partially de-coupled from the source systems and future 


 
integration support effort is reduced.


 
HW and SW change is controlled and delivered 


 
with a formal process with tools and automated processes 


 
to insure controlled and efficient change control is delivered 


 
to the project across all operating environments.


 
A pre-packaged development environment including


 
all tools and processes are delivered via solution centers.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 64


 


Information Technology Execution Architecture


 




 




Description:
This capability covers the management of Information 


 
Technology, and the related processes to create, run


 
and maintain the IT architecture, applications and 


 
infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
Execution Architecture:


 
Most planning systems have a limited client UI, some 


 
require client-installed SW, some are web-based. 


 
Most are focused on planning output data views.


 
Transaction/Messaging Services for planning are 


 
typically limited to internal order fulfillment or ATP 


 
functions.


 
Batch Services are traditionally at the heart of 


 
planning systems.


 
Large/long batch optimization runs are the norm.


 
Data Transfer Services typically allow for mass 


 
data movement between applications or internal sites


 
Database Services are usually coupled with the UI for 


 
viewing output data.


 
Security Services are frequently absent in planning 


 
systems due to the normally small number of users.


 
Reporting capabilities are generally limited to viewing 


 
output data online.


Competitive
Execution Architecture:


Criteria:
Some planning products provide both input and output 


 
data viewing, some also support mass editing capabilities


 
via upload/download.


 
Transaction/Messaging Services may also provide


 
integration of planning and ERP applications for data 


 
synchronization using EAI.


 
Batch Services provide periodic refresh of data between 


 
planning and execution systems, running the optimization 


 
and controlling complex processing sequences within the 


 
application.


 
Data Transfer Services are implemented for both internal 


 
and external business activity.


 
Database Services may be extended to data entry and 


 
output data views via the UI. It may also be used for data 


 
staging or for better access control.


 
Security Services are primarily for authentication services


 
Reporting is delivered by via data warehouse.


 
Print Services may be deployed where large static 


 
reporting is delivered.


Market Leading
Execution Architecture:


Criteria:
The best web-based UI has a small network footprint.


 
Transaction/Messaging Services may be outsourced to 


 
business network providers for transaction routing or 


 
provide a message bus within the application architecture.


 
Batch Services provide control for complex and 


 
interrelated processes across all applications.


 
Data Transfer Services may provide secure and 


 
compress data migration for both internal and 


 
external system feeds.


 
Database Services may extend to provide analysis or 


 
complex reporting capabilities.


 
Security Services are extended to include authorization


 
services and user profiles to support internal and 


 
external user bases.


 
Reporting is an integral part of the planning solution.


 
Simple to complex static, ad-hoc, or packaged data 


 
analytics can deliver this capability.


 
Offline Simulation/What-if capabilities may be 


 
provided to allow offline analysis of altering business 


 
rules to assess impact before they are implemented.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 65


 


Information Technology Infrastructure Management


 




 




Description:
This capability covers the management of Information 


 
Technology, and the related processes to create, run and 


 
maintain the IT architecture, applications and 


 
infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
Operations Architecture/Physical Infrastructure 


 
Management:


 
Processes/Staff exist to assess operational status 


 
of key datacenter components.


 
Manual procedures are defined to restore failed services.


 
Capacity is upgraded based on infrequent analysis, 


 
actual failures or reported performance problems. 


 
Recovery activities are always “fire-drills”.


 
All activity/processes have equal priority/access 


 
to capacity (servers, networks, services).


 
Data and SW backup is ad-hoc.


 
Batch scheduling is handled on a “timed” basis. 


 
There is no visibility to failed processes. Multi-


 
application batch integration is ad-hoc or manual.


 
Printing to local printers is supported via user request. 


 
There are practical limits on volume and potential 


 
network impact.


 
Availability and Performance management is ad-hoc. 


 
No SLA exists.


Competitive
Operations Architecture/Physical Infrastructure 


Criteria:
Management:


 
Tools are in-place to monitor and report any primary


 
service failure.


 
Processes/scripts are defined for operations or support 


 
staff to recover failed services.


 
Capacity is periodically evaluated. Upgrades are


 
implemented based on evaluation results. Sudden 


 
changes in resource usage can create surprise failures.


 
Processes are scheduled to avoid capacity bottlenecks.. 


 
Manual priority is established for each activity.


 
Data and SW backups are scheduled as needed. 


 
Recovery is manual based on request.


 
Each application has an internal batch scheduling 


 
capability. Cross-application batch integration is 


 
handled via “triggering”. Multiple scheduling tools 


 
may be used.


 
Mass printing and distribution is handled on site-


 
based printers and manual distribution.


 
Formal SLA's are written and metrics established


 
to manually track and report services availability 


 
and performance.


Market
Operations Architecture/Physical Infrastructure 


Leading
Management:


Criteria:
Tools, processes and redundancy is planned and 


 
implemented to automatically recovery from service 


 
failures (lights out operations).


 
Capacity is modeled and actively monitored. 


 
Thresholds are established for alerting support of 


 
potential failures or performance impacts. 


 
Priority schemes and tools are implemented to 


 
reduce capacity requirements and insure critical 


 
business processes have required capacity.


 
Data and SW backup and recoveries are fully 


 
automated. Data and SW redundancy is maintained 


 
for immediate recovery. Backups are rotated off-site 


 
for disaster recovery.


 
There is a master production batch scheduling 


 
capability. Cross-application integration and visibility 


 
is fully supported with a single tool.


 
Print management is implemented to enable print 


 
routing, support reprint, print monitoring and reduce 


 
network impact of printing. 


 
Tools are implemented to constantly monitor and 


 
report services availability and performance metrics. 


 
Real-time visibility is provided to SLA compliance.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 66


 


Information Technology Application Management


 




 




Description:
This capability covers the management of 


 
Information Technology, and the related processes to 


 
create, run and maintain the IT architecture, 


 
applications and infrastructure.


Basic Criteria:
Operations Architecture/Application Management:


 
Manual processes/staff exist to assess operational status 


 
of key application components.


 
Manual procedures are defined to restore failed 


 
application services.


 
Application support reviews application error 


 
logs to determine the cause of failures.


 
Application performance issues are reported by users.


 
Support then takes action to address them.


 
Client/Workstation SW must be manually 


 
distributed/installed and upgraded over time. Old 


 
versions may be incompatible with new releases.


 
New SW installation or fix migrations are manual and 


 
overlays prior software components.


 
Users call application support directly with application 


 
questions or problems.


 
Application availability and performance levels 


 
are managed ad-hoc. 


 
No SLA exists.


Competitive
Operations Architecture/Application 


Criteria:
Management:


 
Tools are in-place to monitor and report a key 


 
application service failure.


 
Processes/scripts are defined for support staff to 


 
recover failed application services.


 
The application error logs are parsed and 


 
detected errors create an alert or notification of 


 
failures.


 
Application performance is periodically evaluated 


 
to insure it continues to meet business needs.


 
Clients use web browser, but must download


 
and install browser plug-in. Version checking is 


 
embedded to prevent application corruptions. 


 
Processes/Scripts are built to migrate SW changes 


 
across environments (including maintaining copies 


 
of old versions).


 
Users or application help desk log problems to a 


 
problem ticket capability. Support staff monitor 


 
and address problems reported. Formal SLA's are 


 
written and a process established to manually track


 
and report key application metrics.


Market Leading
Operations Architecture/Application Management:


Criteria:
Tools are implemented and integrated with the 


 
application to detect and auto-recover from


 
many application service failures. Where automated


 
recovery is not possible, automated notification 


 
of the failure is executed.


 
Tools are implemented to collect and monitor 


 
key application performance metrics. Key thresholds 


 
are established and support is notified to proactively 


 
address potential performance problems.


 
All user components are Web-based (no plug-ins). 


 
Standard browser is all that is needed. 


 
No SW distribution, no version control issues.


 
Tools are implemented to control changes, 


 
maintain code versions, and package/deliver 


 
upgrades across environments. Both install or 


 
back-out can be executed rapidly.


 
Users log problem tickets and support is immediately 


 
notified of critical issues. Users are notified when 


 
ticket/problem is closed. Key SLA support metrics 


 
are captured and reported.


 
Tools are implemented to constantly monitor and 


 
report application availability and performance metrics. 


 
Real-time visibility is provided to SLA compliance.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 67


 


Performance Management


 




 




Description:
The capability covers process steps to define and 


 
set targets based to measure and report corporate 


 
performance. The nature of the processes is generic, 


 
which makes them applicable to all capabilities that 


 
need to be measured. This capability area is closely 


 
related to Finance.


Basic 
Operations Management Objectives:


Criteria:
Performance measures are focused on individual 


 
performance and not related to business objectives.


 
End-to-end Integration:


 
Performance measures do not span the supply chain


 
due to limited alignment of departmental goals.


 
Measure Focus:


 
Performance measures are limited to financial 


 
measures only.


 
Performance measures focus on punishment 


 
rather than reward.


 
Scope of Metrics:


 
Performance metrics for organizations, work teams, 


 
and individuals are minimal.


Competitive
Operations Management Objectives:


Criteria:
Some team performance measures have been 


 
introduced that are focused on business unit 


 
objectives.


 
End-to-end Integration:


 
Performance measures span the internal supply 


 
chain but mainly from a high level strategic 


 
perspective.


 
Measure Focus:


 
Performance measures are used to prioritize 


 
action points for key customers.


 
Performance measures are used to promote 


 
collaboration with suppliers to improve services, 


 
but are also used to serve the relationship if no 


 
immediate improvements are obtained.


 
Scope of Metrics:


 
Functional performance objectives are used.


Market 
Operations Management Objectives:


Leading
There is an integrated performance management 


Criteria:
system where an optimal mix of individual and 


 
team measures are directly tied to business objectives.


 
End-to-end Integration:


 
Performance measures span the internal and 


 
external supply chain and are operationally as well as 


 
strategically focused and linked to customer 


 
needs satisfaction. The total supply chain is 


 
monitored continuously and measures are used to


 
optimize performance.


 
Measure Focus:


 
There is a full range of heard financial and soft 


 
performance measures to ensure that customer 


 
needs are fully met.


 
Delivery to customer requested delivery dates is 


 
measured, as well as order aging for back orders.


 
Performance measures focus on rewards and 


 
improvement opportunities.


 
Scope of Metrics:


 
Business strategy, performance objectives and 


 
goals for organization, work teams and individuals 


 
are defined and aligned with performance targets 


 
and goals.


Description:
The capability covers process steps to define and set 


 
targets based to measure and report corporate 


 
performance. The nature of the processes is generic, 


 
which makes them applicable to all capabilities that 


 
need to be measured. This capability area is closely 


 
related to Finance.


Basic 
Usage of Metrics:


Criteria:
Metrics are occasionally used to drive performance.


 
Focus of Metrics:


 
Metrics internally focused, such as terminal utilization, 


 
vehicle utilization and production variance; KPIs are 


 
measured monthly or quarterly.


Competitive
Usage of Metrics:


Criteria:
Metrics integrated into incentive programs and 


 
reward structure.


 
Focus of Metrics:


 
Metrics are work group and business focused, 


 
such as output, yield, and efficiency; 


 
KPIs are measured weekly or daily.


Market 
Usage of Metrics:


Leading
Metrics are integrated into incentive programs 


Criteria:
and used to drive continuous performance 


 
improvement.


 
Focus of Metrics:


 
Metrics are customer and shareholder value


 
focused, such as on-time delivery, product 


 
quality and profitability; KPIs are measured at 


 
optimal frequency to allow immediate corrective action.


 








 

 
 



TABLE 68


 


Quality Management


 




 




Description:
This capability covers all processes to 


 
ensure and maintain the required high 


 
levels of quality for services and products 


 
offered and produced, throughout the 


 
entire value chain.


Basic 
Quality is been reviewed occasionally 


Criteria:
and locally. Actions to improvement 


 
are taken on an operational basis.


 
Basic understanding of requirements with 


 
many gaps. Infrequent updates to customer needs.


 
No defined quality strategy.


 
No defined quality process.


 
Carriers do not participate in quality 


 
driven initiatives.


Competitive
Quality management processes are established. 


Criteria:
Targets are locally defined and measured 


 
with a well-defined KPI metrics. 


 
Adequate understanding of requirements 


 
with a few gaps.


 
Periodic updates reflect changing customer needs.


 
Each business unit uses separate transportation 


 
quality strategies.


 
Initiating TQM process, having completed 


 
ISO9000 programs.


 
Carriers mandated to participate in quality 


 
programs.


Market 
Enterprise wide quality targets are set up. 


Leading
Measurements based on a well defined structured 


Criteria:
process are taken. Targets are defined.


 
Measures to improve quality are defined 


 
on operational, tactical and strategic levels.


 
Clear understanding of needs. Requirements 


 
continuously updated.


 
A formal, firm-wide transportation-specific 


 
quality strategy is in place.


 
Fully developed TQM process implemented 


 
into transportation with independent audits.


 
Carriers participate fully in quality process.


 





 FIG. 12 shows a multidimensional postal industry performance reference set 1200 (“reference set 1200”) that provides a capability detail pool from which the system described below may obtain benchmarking tables for a postal business. The reference set 1200 includes multiple key assessment performance reference tables (“reference tables”), two of which are labeled 1202 and 1204. Each reference table may provide the benchmarking criteria for a specific capability, such as those noted above with respect to FIGS. 2-11.
One dimension of each table may establish the ‘Basic’ performance capability level 140 specifying ‘Basic’ performance assessment criteria, the ‘Competitive’ performance capability level 142 specifying ‘Competitive’ performance assessment criteria, and the ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level 144 specifying ‘Market Leading’ performance assessment criteria. Another dimension of each table may specify one or more key assessment areas (KAAs), several of which are labeled 1206, 1208, and 1210. As noted above, performance capability criteria, e.g., the PCC 1212, populates each key assessment performance reference table to provide benchmark criteria for ‘Basic’, ‘Competitive’, and ‘Market Leading’ characteristics.
The reference set 1200 represents the HPCA model 100. Consistent with the HPCA model 100, the reference set 1200 may organize multiple reference tables into a hierarchical structure defining discrete changes in granularity. In one implementation, the hierarchical structure includes reference tables, sub-platforms, platforms, and models. FIG. 12 labels three sub-platforms 1214, 1216, and 1218. The reference set 1200 may further organize the sub-platforms into platforms, two of which are labeled 1220 and 1222. Platforms aggregate into the HPCA model 100 and corresponding reference set 1200. Additional, different, or fewer levels of granularity may be defined in the HPCA model 100.
The reference set 1200 may dynamically populate the reference tables with the most up-to-date performance capability criteria, for example upon retrieval and presentation by a business analysis consultant. The performance capability criteria may be retrieved from a performance capability criteria database or other information source.
 FIG. 12 also shows an example of a database implementation 1224 of a portion of a reference table. In particular, the database implementation 1224 includes records (e.g., the records 1226, 1228, 1230) that establish each PCC 1212. In the example shown, each record includes a PCC field 1232, a category specifier field 1234, and a KAA specifier field 1236. Other fields may be provided, such as a reference table assignment field or reference set assignment field. The records categorize each PCC into a specific category (e.g., Basic), into a specific KAA, and, optionally, into a specific reference table in a specific reference set for any particular HPCA model.
 FIG. 13 shows a high performance capability assessment system (“system”) 1300. The system 1300 includes a processor 1302 and a memory 1304. Several databases support the operation of the system 1300, including a performance capability database 1306, a performance measured database 1308, a capability detail pool database 1310, and an assessment results database 1326. The system 1300 may include a local display 1312 and input/output interfaces 1317 (e.g., including a keyboard, mouse, microphone, speakers, or other device), and, through the communication interface 1314 and networks 1316, may communicate with remote devices 1318 and remote displays 1320. The networks 1316 may be any combination of external networks (e.g., the Internet) and internal networks (e.g., corporate LANs). The displays 1312 and 1320 may, for example, present performance capability assessment models 1322 that the system 1300 retrieves from the capability detail pool database 1310 for review, modification, and application by process engineers or other individuals. With regard to local, access or access by the remote devices 1318, the system 1300 may include a login processing program 1324 to authenticate and/or authorize access to the system 1300. To that end, the login processing program 1324 may include username/password verification, private/public key encryption, or other validation and data protection capabilities.
In one implementation, the performance capability database 1306 stores performance capability criteria. As will be described in more detail below, the system 1300 may populate performance capability assessment models with performance capability criteria suited to any particular platform (e.g., customer interaction platform 102, enablement platform 104 and asset management platform 106 etc.) and business capability at one or more capability levels across one or more key assessment areas. The performance measured database 1308 may store the determined, measured, or otherwise ascertained characteristics, criteria, and other measured data of a particular key assessment area as representative practice data 1348. The representative practice data 1348 may be obtained through interviews with business consultants and industrial engineers, through online questionnaires, through manual or automated analysis of business data (e.g., year end operating reports), or in other manners. The capability detail pool database 1310 stores the capability detail pool 1200, which includes pre-defined performance capability assessment models 1322. The assessment results database 1326 stores determined capability levels for specific capabilities that have been analyzed.
The system 1300 facilitates the review, modification, creation, and application of performance capability assessment models. In that role, performance capability assessment model manipulation logic (“manipulation logic”) 1346 within the system 1300 creates, retrieves, and stores capability assessment data 1328 in the memory 1304. The manipulation logic 1346 may establish capability assessment data 1328 in the memory 1304, including a capability assessment data structure 1330 with multiple capability levels (“CL”) 1332 organized along a capability scale dimension, multiple key assessment areas (“KAA”) 1334 organized along a key factor dimension, and performance capability criteria (“PCC”) 1336 that populates the performance capability assessment model 1330. The manipulation logic 1346 may vary widely in implementation, and, as one example, may include data storage logic 1352 that saves data in memory and user interface logic that accepts capability level specifications, key assessment area specifications and performance capability criteria inputs to create new performance capability assessment models, modify existing performance capability assessment models, delete performance capability assessment models, or retrieve performance capability assessment models for review.
In one implementation, the manipulation logic 1346 establishes the capability assessment data structure 1330 to include a multidimensional postal industry performance reference set that includes multiple key assessment performance reference tables in which the key assessment performance reference tables include a ‘Basic’ performance capability level, a ‘Competitive’ performance capability level and a ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level.
The capability assessment data 1328 may also include a capability position specifier 1338. The capability position specifier 1338 may record the capability level along the performance capability scale 146, as determined for any particular capability. Thus, the system 1300 may store the capability level in the assessment results database 1326 or elsewhere for future retrieval and review.
In one implementation, the data population logic 1340 may be a data population program executed by the processor 1302 that populates template performance capability assessment models. For example, the data population logic 1340 may include input logic 1350 that accepts input specifying a capability of interest that indicates a particular performance capability assessment model. The data population logic 1340 may include query logic 1345 that executes database queries and prompts a user for input to obtain the corresponding performance capability criteria for the capability of interest.
In another implementation, for example, the query logic 1345 may receive an input specifying a postal industry area and a postal industry key assessment area with the postal industry area for analysis. The query logic 1345 searches the multidimensional postal industry performance reference set for a matching key assessment performance reference table that matches the postal industry area and the postal industry key assessment area, and retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table.
The data population logic 1340 may further include storage logic that adds the retrieved performance capability criteria to the template performance capability assessment model. The data population logic 1340 produces populated performance capability assessment structures 1342 that may be stored in the capability detail pool database 1310.
In addition to the analysis process described above, the system 1300 may provide an automated analysis of representative practice data 1348 that identifies relevant performance capability criteria and determines the position on the performance capability scale 146 of each key assessment area corresponding to the performance capability criteria for the representative practice data 1348. As one example, the system 1300 may implement capability assessment logic 1344 that includes comparison and/or matching logic that analyzes the representative practice data 1348 with respect to performance capability criteria to locate key assessment areas for which the system 1300 can determine capability levels to obtain a resultant performance capability level for each key assessment area.
Furthermore, the capability assessment logic 1344 may determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 146 as the capability position specifier 1338, for a capability under examination given the knowledge of where the key assessment areas corresponding to the capability under examination fall in each capability level. Thus, for example, the capability assessment logic 1344 may determine an overall capability level for a capability corresponding to the capability level for the majority of the key assessment areas, or it may apply a weighted analysis technique to give more emphasis to some key assessment areas than others in determining the overall position on the performance capability scale 146 for a capability. As another example, the capability assessment logic 1344 may implement an expert system (e.g., based on a neural network trained on prior determinations) that analyzes the determined characteristics with respect to the performance capability criteria and ascertains where the capability under examination falls along the performance capability scale 146 for each of the key assessment areas, or overall on the performance capability scale.
 FIG. 14 shows a flow diagram 1400 for creating performance capability assessment models. The performance capability assessment model creator (e.g., the manipulation logic 1346) establishes a key factor dimension for the performance capability assessment model (1402). The performance capability assessment model creator also establishes a capability scale dimension for the performance capability assessment model (1404). The capability scale dimension may define a scale of increasing organizational capability. For example, the structure creator may create the ‘Basic’ capability level 140, the ‘Competitive’ capability level 142, and the ‘Market Leading’ capability level 144. The performance capability assessment model creator also populates the performance capability assessment model with performance capability criteria (1406). A capability detail pool 1200 may be formed to hold multiple tailored key assessment performance reference tables (1408). The performance capability assessment model creator may store the populated assessment structure in the capability detail pool for subsequent retrieval and analysis (1410).
 FIG. 15 shows a flow diagram 1500 for retrieving and applying performance capability assessment models. A selection of a capability to be analyzed is obtained (1502). In one implementation, the system 1300 receives input data that specifies a postal industry area and a postal industry key assessment area for analysis. For example, the system 1300 may accept input from a business consultant that specifies a capability for analysis. The system 1300 may query the capability detail pool 1200 for a corresponding performance capability assessment model (1504). The corresponding performance capability assessment model may be pre-defined in the capability detail pool 1200, or the data population logic 1230 (or other actor) may populate a performance capability assessment model template that the system 1300 newly creates, or that the system 1300 retrieves from a data store, such as the capability detail pool database 1310.
In another example, the system 1300 searches the multidimensional postal industry performance reference set in the capability detail pool 1200 for a matching key assessment performance reference table based on the input data that specifies a postal industry platform and a postal industry key assessment area. The system 1300 retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table and initiates analysis of the matching key assessment performance reference table to obtain a resultant performance capability level for the postal industry key assessment area.
The system 1300 obtains representative practice data 1348 for the capability under examination in the specific business under review (1506). For example, a business consultant may interview the business to determine how the business currently executes the capability under review. As another example, a representative from the business may complete a questionnaire, submit business data for analysis and parameter extraction, or otherwise provide the characteristics of their current capability execution. As a further example, the system 1300 may retrieve the representative practice data 1348 from a database of previously obtained representative practice data.
The system 1300 compares the representative practice data 1348 to the performance capability criteria in the performance capability assessment model (1508). For example, a business consultant may use his or her expertise to arrive at a determination of capability level for the business and the capability under examination (1510). Alternatively or additionally, the capability assessment logic 1344 may perform an automated analysis of the assessment results data in the assessment results database 1326 and ascertain the capability level on the performance capability scale 146 (1510). The system 1300 may store the assessment results, including the determined capability level, for future reference in the assessment results database 1326 or other location (1512).
 FIG. 16 shows a flow diagram 1600 for analyzing representative practice data 1348 to determine a postal industry and a postal key assessment area to which the representative practice data applies. The system 1300 receives representative practice data 1348 as input data (1602). The system 1300 may receive the representative practice data 1348 from a database query performed by the query logic 1345 that the query logic executes periodically, when instructed by an operator, and/or automatically against any number of available database sources that store representative practice data 1348. The capability assessment logic 1344 analyzes the representative practice data 1348 to identify performance capability criteria in the capability detail pool 1200 that the capability assessment logic 1344 determines relevant to the representative practice data 1348 (1604). For example, the capability assessment logic 1344 may compare and/or match the content of the representative practice data 1348 with the performance capability criteria using natural language processing (NLP), text string and/or substring matching, by comparing tags linked to the representative practice data 1348 and that specify that any portion of the representative practice data 1348 is applicable to a specific PCC, by querying for a manual classification of the representative practice data 1348 to a PCC, or other matching technique. The capability assessment logic 1344 may score and/or weight a performance capability criteria and compare the score and/or weight to a user specified relevance threshold to rank the relevance of the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 1348 (1606). The user may specify particular terms and/or phrases to search and match between the performance capability criteria and the representative practice data 1348, in order to score the performance capability criteria.
The capability assessment logic 1344 may determine, based on the number of performance capability criteria that meet or exceed the relevance threshold, that the capability assessment logic 1344 has identified a sufficient number of performance capability criteria for a specific key assessment area in order to determine a performance capability level for the capability as a whole or any key assessment area within the capability (1608). As one example, where at least 51% of the performance capability criteria for a particular key assessment area meet or exceed the relevance threshold, the capability assessment logic 1344 applies the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 1348. In another example, the performance capability criteria for a particular key assessment area may be ranked in importance and/or designated as mandatory in order to assess the key assessment area. In the event the capability assessment logic 1344 identifies the mandatory performance capability criteria for a key assessment area the capability assessment logic 1344 applies the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 1348.
The capability assessment logic 1344 may apply the performance capability criteria meeting or exceeding the relevance threshold to the representative practice data 1348 to determine whether any particular PCC is met. Accordingly, as the capability assessment logic 1344 analyzes the PCC, the system 1300 tracks the best fit of the representative practice data 1348 to the PCCs in the key assessment performance reference tables. In other words, the system 1300 determines how the representative practice data 1348 meets (or does not meet) each PCC, thereby gaining insight into whether the representative practice data 1348 is indicative of Basic, Competitive, or Market Leading practices.
The system 1300 may also gauge the position on the performance capability scale 146 of each key assessment area corresponding to the performance capability criteria (1610). The capability assessment logic 1344 may further determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 146 for a capability (1612). The capability assessment logic 1344 may establish that a desired number and/or designated mandatory performance capability criteria for the key assessment areas have been identified as relevant to a capability and sufficient to determine the position on the performance capability scale 146 for the capability. For example, the capability assessment logic 1344 may determine an overall capability level for the capability based on the capability level determined for the majority of the key assessment areas. The capability assessment logic 1344 may apply a weighted analysis technique to give more emphasis to some key assessment areas than others in determining the overall position on the performance capability scale 146 for the capability. Although selected aspects, features, or components of the implementations are depicted as being stored in computer-readable memories (e.g., as computer-executable instructions or performance capability assessment models), all or part of the systems and structures may be stored on, distributed across, or read from other computer-readable media. The computer-readable media may include, for example, secondary storage devices such as hard disks, floppy disks, and CD-ROMs; a signal, such as a signal received from a network or received at an antenna; or other forms of memory, including ROM or RAM, either currently known or later developed.
Various implementations of the system 1300 may include additional or different components. A processor may be implemented as a microprocessor, a microcontroller, a DSP, an application specific integrated circuit (ASIC), discrete logic, or a combination of other types of circuits or logic. Similarly, memories may be DRAM, SRAM, Flash or any other type of memory. The processing capability of the system may be distributed among multiple system components, such as among multiple processors and memories, optionally including multiple distributed processing systems. Parameters, databases, and other data structures may be separately stored and managed, may be incorporated into a single memory or database, may be logically and physically organized in many different ways, and may be implemented in many ways, including data structures such as linked lists, hash tables, or implicit storage mechanisms. Programs may be combined or split among multiple programs, or distributed across several memories and processors.
The HPCA 100 model provides unexpectedly good results for a performance capability assessment model, particularly in the postal industry. In particular, the combinations of key assessment areas and particular assessment criteria of the HPCA model, including the criteria noted in Tables 4-68 above, provide significant advantages over other assessment models. The unexpectedly good results include clearly identifying and delineating from among multiple related complex processes specific processes to improve, and how to improve the process and identifying concrete and measurable improvement goals.
While various embodiments of the invention have been described, it will be apparent to those of ordinary skill in the art that many more embodiments and implementations are possible within the scope of the invention. Accordingly, the invention is not to be restricted except in light of the attached claims and their equivalents.